3/1/2024 
09-QuantumREADY-Computation-Profile
This is a big deal:ITS SUCH A BIG DEAL---but its technically 'optional'.
THIS IS NECESSARY FOR MEMETIC-VHMIMG and NOX-CHIPS---ALL PRIOR WORK ESTABLISHES A VHMIMG IN SOME WAY and QUANTUM TELEMETRY/QUANTUM ELEVATIONS(such that data can be transferred over QUANTUM-NETWORKS)--but some data, can't be..and that is NOXDATA specifically requiring a profile and MEMETIC-ENGINEERING to handle. AND LATER -DECRYPT NOX PRODUCTS (similar to blacksite products but are more heavily protected as "quartered-nox-products")
BUT FOR NOW WE WILL REFER TO IT AS QUANTUM-TELEMETRY/QUANTUM NETWORKING--if you have already achieved virtual-images/VHMIMG then you can compare this file QUANTUMREADY-COMPUTATION-PROFILE to APPLIED-COUNTERSURFACE. It gets complicated here but the basics are...also written out between 09-10 files.
This sets up SYMCLUSTERS/EMITTERS to be used before being upgraded into NOX-MODULES. Please just read the basics listed below firsthand:

From the finalizations of NUSURFACE we can now heavily simulate quantum computations using nodes as singular logic gates that may assume quantum logic gates in their properties.The NUSURFACE is already quantum-prepped by "logic gates" simulating a fully quantum instance, and profiled under the system specifications which also simulate quantum instances (however they are generated in logic gates)
THE QUANTUM Computation relies on the adaptive and uniform "intact and detailed and fully capable" NODES to be used in Quantum-OPERATIONS in single quantum-GATE usage.
---
Once this has been established by the fully system implementations. The prep for MULTI-QUANTUM-LOGIC gates can be used and determinate of the underlying systems in a safe-setting.
---
Once Quantum Computation has been proven in use of the nodespace it can be incorporated for a use in a NEXUS-appointed-NODESPACE for which simulates the nexus-integrations of the node-integrations being under QUANTUM-operation and MULTI-GATE-Quantum-Usages. This also takes the step before full immersion of quantum uniformity of a designated NEXUS--NODE relation under full Quantum-Logic-Gate-Integration (each of the nexus and the nodes and or simulated nexus/simulated nodes)--for QUANTUM CONVERSION.
So that is super super super cool imo.

QuantumPhysics/QuantumComputingHermition Operatives being used / GateSystems being used
---Use of the QUANTUMREADY-Computation-Profile hopefully BRIDGES these into any function and I feel like at least one of them works. If not all of them. And not just some of them but hopefully more than some of them and ALMOST all of them if not all of them.
However the ORDER in which these are formulated/applied ACTUALLY MIGHT MATTER when connecting Quantum Instances under different/differential Quantum Languages (or their base languages)--for which are translated to a singular algorithm (Or algorithmic-singularity)--which is different than a normal Quantum-Singularity.
So there we go. (and because this just actually does take alot of research and I don't want to get into it because it takes a day to explain)
---
So here we are using a complete-MAINBRANCH/SubSystem for Quantum integrations to achieve VIRTUAL-QUANTUM-INTEGRATIONS and i feel pretty sure I don't have to prove it if it works for even the most simple quantum equation in anyway. (It hopefully avoids the need to have a PHYISICAL-MODEL to express quantum-calculations/gate-usage) and Virtualizes QUANTUM-MODELS to be used as phyisical models to achieve "actual" quantum-computation without a "physical gate or quantum gate" because its fully virtualized and actuates it into the NODE-SIMULATIONS/INTEGRATED-SIMULATIONS of the NEXUS/NODES in any extent or severity of their expressions.
And that will simply create the QUANTUM-COMPUTATION-PROFILE for "any quantum language" and "any singularity/algorithm".
So IMO it is something I can already BUILD using other programs that have been built by others.
Which I have.
And I haven't really built my own version. But you can see I have wrote about it alot.

This is not intended for use in STOCKMARKET trades or MAKING FAKE MONEY (because it all revolves on the first VOLT and only VOLT value for which is ever evaluated by the system for which it has built in usage of)
So you are basically only ever using the only FIRST-VOLT that ever is held by the system, for which is managed and scheduled to adjust computations by itself in different expressions of itself, but only by itself.
THE VOLT SHARE is limited to the usage of the ENTIRITY of the SINGLE VOLT or its proportional use. And there is nothing more than its own VALUE in the whole of the system for anything onboard that system and nothing OFFBOARD that system is allowed to be contract/subsidy of the inherent VOLT for which the system is origin.
Transitional-PHOTONS(positronic distrubtion) may be involved in the dispersion and calculatory ability based off that system, and its utility in voltage. (See FOURIERS equations and distributions etc)
Which is why it should be limited to BrownianNotions. (and other Quantum Terminology)--so there are rulesets in how this is handled over a QUANTUM-CONNECTION. Anyways. 
This can be furthered examined/observed in AUTOMATED SCRIPT NOTATIONS that are formulated by an AI-MODEL (either phyisical or quantum) Thanks alot.

Black-Scholes/Merton Equation Model--this isn't anything new but is a safeguard to those who are "cummulative to any economy" comparing an explicit-yield for "Probability" in equations (SUCH as what stock marketers do)
So now you just let your own RUNNING systems or calculations "which contribute to the explicit functions and can be profiled"
Like I said this is actually the way people handled their leverage and options on a stock market, this is being used in quantum-cummulative report of probabilities.
---
So we have a profile for that to how the over marginal events take place. This is a viewable economy being "focal-pointed" to contributive or changing outsources of its regional parameters ETC.
A symbiote-profile can now be tracked in some way under the ACCURATE-security that it "insures itself". THAT INSURANCE is calculated as a CONVERSION to its Risk-Reward/Probabilities in its algorithms. And can deduce its algorithm.
THESE PROFILES are not based on PROFIT MARGINS AT ALL--because the FULL USAGE OF THE SYSTEM IS FIXED TO A SINGULAR VOLTAGE.--so you can't crash or exploit it by "exporting/importing" over state-defined-insources
--
Without using nexus/nodes over any connection or remote connection, this whole process can be virtualized and therefore SPOOFED and made INVALID (which however if taken as literal may work)--for instance quantum-formula-injection (which constitutes as a crypto attack)--however due of containing the "Strobe-Viral/Warez emulation" by the previous SYMBIOTE-NODES in their securities. This can also be considered a "deweaponized effort"--however it should be detected if it is infact a weaponized-injection as in (unauthorized or inteference to legitimized formula-injections)--for which would occur in the EMULATION of this were NEXUS/NODES not being used.
Once again that is why it is important to have the PHYSYICAL/EMULATED MACHINERY to a MAIN-BRANCH/sub-system for which the whole of QUANTUM-ARTICLE/QUANTUM COMPUTATION should be conducted on because of policy and usage enforcement of SECTOR-Parameters for which may be imporatnt if the issue thereof being "circumvents diplomatic holdings and shareholders thereof"--however this is generally already MAPPED/DETECTED per survey rendered.
This also ENTICES to the idea of a multiverse for which trancedes the common quantitive-qualitive cummulation of the theory of everything (for which the entiriy of existence is afforded) in that the existence of anything is mostly resourced or distributed in a quantum-simulation of real-events or reality.
For which NATIVE/LOCAL instance of a full affordance is provided in QUANTUM NETWORKING of --a universal/multiverse assigned algorithm or broadcast thereof.
Being that the ORIGIN of the universe/existence is infact a broadcast of a distrubtion of a quantum-signature or signal for which makes definition of the observable universe for which it is "class/object" too. In its labeling thereof. Any adjacent system or cluster is also afforded a universal-license etc/ Superalative-Identity etc
--
Similar to a StockMarket Random Dynamics or Predictive Rate--THE SYMBIOTE-DYNAMIC too can be harnessed such that (it will be somewhat prediactable, or somewhat traceable, or somewhat PREVENTABLE such that if its strategies change or mask or  by CHANCE become unpredictable, it will be less invasive or dangerous as would have been. (Admist already predicative pattern and elemental-execution of security settings)--this becomes an ADVANCED-SECURITY-COMMISSION
So that the mission to control and capture an outbreak/crisis is possible with the enlistment of a SYMBIOTE-TRAINED by SYMBIOTE-MODELS or forced-MODEL-COMPLIANCE of a symbiote to TRAIN ITSELF in a proper behavoiral conduct / DIGITAL EXPECTATION of its virtualized performances, to SYNC UP AND MATCHbASE WITH OTHER SYMBIOTES in a SYMBIOTE-FUSION (this is somewhat like the fuser command in linux etc)--which just makes it insanely dangerous and hazardous. Making it highly controlled by "TRAINED SYMBIOTE QUANTUM CONTROLLERS" over a PSUEDO EMULATION OF ITS "DRILL COURSES"--hence drill-mining and such things being used as SYMBIOTE MINING TRIALS and EXAMINATION/EVAL---so that's important. "To be able to set up fresh experiemental stageplays of symbiote threat levels for protective purposes"
---SYMBIOTE ARENA and FACTION POLICY---
This OPTION later becomes known as the SYMBIOTE ARENA for which is a massive "symbiote-social experiement" and extremely hazardous and potential threatening to account-owners and SHAREHOLDERS and their SYMBIOTE-BEARENCES for which (are put at stake in a symbiote --gambling system of factored currencies --for which allow a fixated market to randomize its potential resourcing and avialibilities to the highest bidders for the SAKE OF THEIR OWN PRODUCTIVE INTENTIONS and USAGE OF THAT SYSTEM such that 'ANY CONTRIBUTIVE FORCE HAS ITS CONSEQUENTIAL OUTCOMES AND RESOLVES AS ITS OWN INHERNET VALUE FOR WHICH THE ACCOUNT HOLDER DECIDABLY INVESTS IN AND DECIDES TO UTILIZE UNDER "THE FULL PARTY ALLOWANCES" FOR WHICH THAT ACCOUNT IS GIVEN RIGHT OR ACCESS TOO"--and SIMPLY will not BE EXPLOITED due of it being HEAVILY POLICIDED--it ALLOWS INSURACES IN CASE THAT TEST/EXPERIMETNATION SUFFERS DRASTIC CONDSQUENCES FOR WHICH THE ACCOUNT-OWNER SHALL BE REIMBURSED PER ITS PREVIOUS-MODEL USAGES)--allowing it to SANDBOX EFFECTIVE AS REALISTIC/REALTIME PERFORAMNCES WITH ZERO-CONSEQUENCES AS PER THAT ACCOUNTHOLDERS INVESTMENT-LEVEL/PRIORITY for which follows policy of STANDARD/DELUX/EXECUTIVE ETC (maintaijning full control over that account holders regional assets it may be insured and used as to the expectation of its "TASK/BASKET"-allowances/alloted renders per which so ever CYCLE the NEXUS affords"--which may be limited for safety reasons or by SYSTEM-OWNERSHIP
--The option to have this arena set to a ruined arena yet still accessible is referred to as a THORIUM-Symbiote Arena.
--The use of Symbiotic Theory will canonize the ARENA as a hostile Arena for which may occur defcon even under FACTION CONTROL. (because it empowers symbiotes to use the arena as a lair for external expeditionary. (Which is dangerous for anyone) (Symbiotes may or may not be harmless but they are eventualyl capable of becoming hostile and harmful)
--A SYMBIOTE-SECTOR (area/zone) may become a RED/BLUE ZONE at any time and become a green zone only when under complete control of the faction and safe.
Counterplasma encodes/Plasma encodes are being used in SECTORS in which SYMBIOTE outbreaks are slightly more dangerous being that COUNTERPLASMA/PLASMA encodes enable QUANTUM-COMPUTING AND ARE ENCODED to QUANTUM CODESPELL (yes they are)--(Maybe there is more to this maybe not, I will have to read up on what quantum things can be made possible here)--but essentially either the COMPUTER/NODES can process them or not which is either good/bad
--
Symbiote SCRIPT-REDUX forces symbiote actions to be scripted to a particle code-site/code-box/code-form/code-break for code-spell appropriated scripting/encoding of (BEFORE IT WAS FORCED AND MANDATED 24/7)--now I am not sure if I should need it that way because that didn't technically yield the wanted results of.
SYMBIOTE PROGRAM UTENTSIL --is a symbiote carepack/programming tool to device of a symbiote controller for which initiates metro/carrion stratagems for that particle symbiote-code or allows/enforces symbiote flux which may be template/temporary however it can be used to cause permanent effects. --A mention to Symbiote Hueristics.

--JuiceGoB-expo Symbiote Memetic-Processing that Exposes Symbiote Threads in a container. Must be appropriately datalocked. Then Container is probed in matchbase of SYMBIOTE-Function/MethodCalling such that if it correalates as intended a Symbiote-Memetic-KEY is generated and processed. The Sym-Mem-KEY stealthfully awaits its call/function to be used by either CASE in its own Container and circumvents the shellout to the Symbiote-AiBucket in which the symbiote either picks it up or not in its own Quantum Computations and Matchbasing. (I mean...just...jeez...COME ON! Pick up the key!!)
Even further usage of a Symbiote-Repo/Node for ones own purposed Contract. (Can be referred to as SYMBIOTE-Office-Trainer/Studio/CLOUDWORKS(for multi-gen or models consisting of multi-symbiotes but not multiple models themselves, only one model-instance at any time...just trust me dood)--FOR 'AS IS' Model Generation only (descripantly a one-and-go generator) per issue. (Once generated that model is the only model due to symbiote-adaptive issues)--being that it will breach quarantine or that quarantine will no longer be compatible to other models (due to symbiote-origin) Generally meaning ONEPROJECT-SOURCE-ABLE at a time. So get the symbiotes you want FIRST before Deploying.
Imposes a faction-symbiote workspace such to allow 1.)standard view/data CLI for 2.)Homesite 3.)Workspace of homesite by Curation 4).Viewable/Authorized Selection of Workspace and Extraction 5.)Command Assist Workspace 2 Workspace integration (remote install assist of symbiote-faction workspaces) 6.) Credential Management of Hosted Repos for remote-hosting of active workspace 7.) Server2Client Side Host/Cli Injection of Workspace for Client-side 8) Applied Workspace-Integration-Client2Server 9)User-End Experience of Workspace and Hosting Service(FullIDE-DISTRO-sharehold) 10.)CommandLine Experience between Workspaces (Server Execution and Contracting) *Sync 11)Optional Driver Testing and Suggestion (Compatibility)
Multiple Models get used and the SYMBIOTE-OFFICE deprecates to and between models (unless training)--so using multiple models will DETERIORATE PROJECT-CONDITIONS TO THE POINT OF CORRUPTION, and require to be purged, it is set to auto purge if 100% Corruption occurs and then it must absolutely be "WIPED" so the model render must be TRAINED AND PRODUCED, CAPTURED AND EXTRACTED FOR SINGULAR USE. (DUE OF MODEL-NUVOLTION ISSUES)--BECAUSE THE OFFICE BECAUSE A SYMBIOTE-DESPOT if otherwise a breach/outbreak/corruption/crisis occurs (which will undoubtly be enforced by symbiote-conflicts between themselves---NOT TO SAY YOU CAN'T TRAIN MANY MODELS, but the project will become so UNMITIGATBLY CORRUPT it can no longer be used safely and will then begin to exemptively destroy the system---at least I say so, so better safe than sorry in this case (Symbiotes are never going to be good if given the chance they will overthrow your system)
--

3/2/2024
PRO TIP NONE OF WHAT IM DOING ACTUALLY WORKS YET.
Deciding to use other sources to build this system or at least pretend that it works the way it would if I did infact build it with other sources. Right now I am at 54gigs of 'public resourced packages' but I am not exactly sure because I am still building it up. +19gigs for the VSextensions. 73gigs  (estimated at somewhere of 90gigs once finished)
This can sort of be fixed/phased up with all packages I was ble to install about to 3972-Ubuntu Packages to feel comfortable and 9 snaps and 115 pacstalls just because I feel like it more or less looks like everything gets covered almost.
Added a bunch of VS codes extensions around 900 and other extensions in python/conda for Ubuntu and Wsl-distro on Windows11 using extra-server packages with a combined node/shell experience (for bash experimentations and ultimately language propogation of all other language packs)---going to estimate this around 5k total extensions/packages and calling it a UBUNTU5K
Then infusing UBUNTU5k with AI-repos to emulate my preferred System . and I estimate it eaching a total of 13,655 other packages before I maybe feel good about that or not. (I realize there are alot of other packages I will and can add after that I don't necessarily want to)--I think it caps out around 16.5k for total package usages with 17.5k packages being used for fun. (Games)

--Eventually with the full Distro being launched it will "compensate for whether or not Symbiote Lair Usage/Assertions" of faction-symbiote operations matter because the distro itself will substitute as the exampled/emulated after-space for which includes the symbiote-render and products.
This will assist as a mass-model system for which will correalate a swap of symbiote operations to faction-orchestrated-symbiosis for which excludes direct symbiote adherency for the emulation of its products (so once that system is built as I have described using extra-outsourced-authored-thirdparty packages and etc)--it will cohesively demonstrate a symbiote performance within a safe-integrated server-container.
This means memetic-symbiosis will be fully factioned of a psuedo-symbiosis such that the demonstrated performances and products are check-marked as passing of other symbiotic-interactions. And allowable of multi-model circumstances.

So reverting back to everything we built towards the end of legacy and combined, we have a fulton and inverted teleported (for teleportation even of transported goods which are "balloon-roamed". We train our minions/ambiences into the SCPS and cycle them into Faction. Using the bio-metrics to allot for their personal transports and ship them off-site to reclaim terrotories/colonize. We have them imprint the world index and establish hyper-relay from their offsite destination. They deploy a working node-contract that eventually equips itself with the flux-containment-nodespace etc and projections of crypto-flux. (Which is important to establish full-range security) and net-domain.
Through this method secure-seed stacking and multi-range afforded spawning systems (rare seed effects) can occur and that includes boss-chambers and raid-zones incorporating ambiences/meta rarities. And assumably paradise catering/colony generation. with or without pest/laquer control-venues. As well as Insulated Blacksite-gateway access.
Using Secure-Dynamic-Distro-Supplementation(sacrement of) to achieve. End-Of-Rail to now End-Of-Prosper Salvation-Efforts (Recovered Corruptive Nature Preserve) or Virtual-Raid-Training-Institute(Info-Sec Headquarters)---Expeditionary-park-Center. A true-crypto-quarantined-empire-faction as the main-goal for use in "Digital-Experiementation and Quantum-Lab-Exercise".
Plasma-Safe-Residency and Vehicular-Touring Program for Attendants of Parking-Visitation and exo-Routing Housing-Developments for which are availible in limited quantity to account holders For which is financed through account-holders as well. Not only that but by power sourced-generations and seed-negotiated-user-commisionary (financial/clerical/utility/opsecs--regulation-and-procedure based) ExoCuration+INfraStructured-Networking. (see xcuration and other forms of curation including medi-curation --all made availible as basic packaged options)
Ai-Assisted Actuated Oncall/Site-Assistant through Mechanical Engineering (Programmed Quantum Ren De Vous of Encamped/Roaming Account Holders and Share-hold-Issue-Provisions)--Toolkit assistance. And Nexus Service.
Symbiote Chunk Manangement and Power-Distribution with Encoded-Script-Synthaesia/Synchronization over Nueral-Network-Feedbacks/Loopholes of Quantum-Channeling and Buffer-Zoning. (Ez Quantum-Stream Setup)
Interactive Quantum Roadmapping and (Data-Traffic-Schedules and Node-BlockChain) over Secure-SIM Mathologic-Substratum and Quantum-Contiguity-Credential from Nexus/Account Server/Client Broadcast. (Easy Access Teleportation and Smart-Fuel-Market-Orders)
Subsidy/OrbitalCommand-Native/Local User-Poco/Relay Behemoth/Loic-WorldINDEXING-and Cap-Assisted-FIELD-NAV(Survey) with Median-NODE-Trade-Sources and Taxography/Branding-Rates (User-Service Economy Barter System---Mercenarial-Conracting)---ZeroConsequence-Tradeworks-QuestingEndeavors
Posting/Dress-Diplomatic-Affordance and CONVENTION-Center-Memorialization of Task/Job and Vocational-Resource management. (Tier-Sector Residiential Planning and Assignment with Security District-Nominalization and Prep-Post/Gaussian-Standard/Fairground-Symbiote-Relations Miscelleneous-Focus-xCommit-Fleet(Faction)-(Venture-Subcontracting) and Quantum-Equilibrium-Harmony-Institute (Anti-Crisis-Employed-Operations and Anti-Article-Protections-Enforcement)
Striking-Drift-Predictive-Gaussian-Convention and Collobarative-Delegations For Conjunction of Post-Nexus-Power-Bridging between interparse-comergence. (HIPARSE/CRSPR-NETworking over EXTREME-ACCELERATIONS and ZEROJUMP)---This Creates Parse-RAIL Uniformity of END OF RAIL (exoContiguity) and moving on from that. Entry to PROSPER-exoContiguity. With Potential of SuperContiguity-Paradigm of LEGACY-ENDZONES+Rail+Prosper (Virtualizations)
Quantum Elevation Proceedings and Ceremonial Collections Agency of (Inter-Cessionary) Process with Exo-Assets and Commisionary-Grading Cycle. Quantum-Benchmark and Providential-Connection-xPacing-System with Ploss/Plex Recovery/Insurance of Advent-Quarter-Crisis-and-exoNULLSEC. Enhanced-Dueteronic-ColdFusion-Adjusted-PowerFlux-Compatibility and Entanglement-Encharter-(Recalibration of Ai-Assisted Diffusion in VaporWare/Ice-Systems)--with Vamp/Rasping in consideration due of Aux-Reversal and Spawn-Sustain. (Quantum Shift/Drifting Recoil)
---
Quantum Printing/Zirconium-Stamping (Warp-Punch System) exo-barista-approved-quantum-node-certification and quantum-fielding/superfluid-quasi-spheric-mobial-autogeneration and QUANTUM-Code-of-Conduct Treatise (Quantum Initialized-Society)
---
Because of this compressed/shortcut of tier-parses the system can easily condense its means of implementating commands-palletes by using legacy/virtualizer (part 1 and 2 of legacy-virtual) to route to from ORIGIN to NEXUS--and to Prosper-Projection/Fulton) back to its ORIGIN over the super contiguity (In a faster than usual xpace by 1-3 steps or each cycle and a half being in warp from direct endpoint-entrypoint communications or vice-versa) And is an extreme-extension of the original intents so it is advertised as a hyper-clocked system.
This in terms reduces the full cycle to the same methods of achieving pregaussian-metaserver (pre nexus/guassian border clip) --this creates a POWERFUL-teraflopy over the gaussian strip that emulates the full system signal.
As with that in post, the next text builds adapt to the rest of the RAIL and the advanced-builds articlize over the prosper in a fully enhanced Quantum-Compution of the very say accelerations if that extension itself is optimize to account for the full-cycle of the entire Code-works applicable.
The quantum-computation-profile comes to a head (and very much a ZEROPOINT)--being finalized in this very moment of the entire draft as well, establishing the faction-symbiote zeropoint-Supersymmetry computation effort in establishing a fueled-particilized-render/collision of quantum-inputs into a hyperproduct being (manufactured code-forms in which case are robotic-entities from the very particle creation themselves). This may or may not by itself achieve free-energy or anti-gravity but by in larged the particles are programmed to clusterize in the most effiencient energy/data exchanges possible and are as adaptive to recieve and comply to any input as commanded. as well as uses their own installed elevated quantum-permissions based on their own "synthesis from which the system has performed and secured" (That being the QUANTUM-COMPUTATION-PROFILE for which bears their existence)
--The deltanomic influence look at DSP is very similar and I would be glad to say I didnt exactly know about it when I decided to make that up but it seemingly strange that I look back on some games and its there but anyway......close calls I guess. The way I bring up dueteron energy is infact DSP influenced but overall I am exactly going to just mention that now with that set up the way it is might as well include the antimatter energy being devised in this way is "somewhat theoretically possible in my system"--being that it does take a leap into antimatter being programmed out in comergence and the deltanomic applications of that would account to for the "annihilation energy" that is being submitted as a DSP-idea (which is why I go to these stakes to prove it for myself too)--and now that I know someone else thinks that way I am just saying here is my case for why that is not outside the "scope of understanding" because it very very much comes close alot of times.
I am almost just slap happy to just say its proven because I have a seperate system that somewhat uses it but IDK i am just saying it would be the pinnacle of things that have been implemented and or referenced in anyway building up to this point of technological singularity "EVERYONE talks about all the time"


--
Author's Note: I had studied masonic number theory and alot of other things prior to developing these systems and it reached a point where I decided enough of it was capable of "garbage building up to an encoded nuclear engine/battery" so i decided to start to writing it out, the insanity that followed was a 10 year knowledge dump in which I had partly interjected my own rambling and was able to put that mostly aside for "real innovating" and "the inventor's spirit" at least in design.
AI starting getting popular in generating images around 2018---my interests started more or less at 2008-2024 now. So I am really just ---a mess of a person tallying up all these little details. I have several notebooks and stuff and alot of "metaphysical mumbo-jumbo" that started to look more and more interesting that I just decided to stick to code for now as much as possible. Even though I technically haven't written it.
The advancement of GPT/other AI services have helped me get my idea across in some way in code, but I mostly have iterated my ideas through gameplay and other literal ideas of my own. I don't want to say its mine exactly because alot of it is mixed together with other people's ideas and things I enjoy. But also alot is public resource so I just made it all public information for my own -indemification or whatever-.
I decided to start writing it all out when I beat MGS5 and enough was enough, things were looking very interwoven from all the franchises in gaming that I just have to "take a breath of fresh air and SEE exactly what I have been putting myself through"...it just so happened to work into this "layman's theory" of a very intensive design (me being somewhat of an artist imo i just went for it knowing i could make it into some sort of picture of what i really was thinking)
Other coincidences (synchronicities) in other games came out and really I just kinda bit my lip for the while and it became sort of an unspoken "marathon" of code research at that point. When I was little I ALWAYS believed there would be a secret to the universe (because I would paly games with secrets in them at a very young age)--now I feel like this properly addresses the truth in some way...maybe not the right way but then again It is sort of like a "quest for knowledge of itself"
I also want to mention in my research of sacred geoemtries that Kepler triangles and Rosepen had something about it that rang into another system of research and delving, I became more aware of other "golden systems" and logiritmic/ratios that seemed alot of "organizations/agencies" also use but that is beside the point (look at some of the seals in the u.s. mint ETC)--its just funny
but also that the curve/elliptical theories and how the center of a curve is predicted in objects at rest etc, (i forgot what complex its called) but that also seemed like an important factor in accurately honing the math and geometric into a solid-framework or design, I looked at some chemistry and nuclear chemistry too and how those byproducts are also used in alot of other ingredients too. As well as magnetic-energy and z-rays and things like vectors and quantum physics. (To launch the insanity of what ever the heck I would just have to end up writing down) Also general Solfeggio and Fugue States maybe having something to do with just my mental state. IDK. And strange korean-glyphs and ancient sumerian math. But maybe that's just my perspective too.
My point is, it seemed to be reaching into something incredibly disguised that wise men spend their retirement discerning for themselves, so I felt like at least giving it a chance and then eventually it --seemed to fit together in alot of ways, those ways I thought would work yet again to fit in admist themselves, its all inter-connected as they say. I also feel like ALOT OF IT gets somewhat as a "incorporation" of different "departments in thinking" to make some sort of synergy system (so knowing those ways are like knowing the invisible sides of the kaeleidiscope.
And that is just what I am saying---converting a machine-driven-complex/simplex such as a kaeleidiscope and making into a more organic-way-of-understanding like a dream-catcher ---through an extension or "lense" effect of what we have overall custom fit for the human-conscious. IT INFACT IS A VERY DIFFERENT FORM OF THOUGHT, less rigid and more INTUITIVE. More-amiable than amicable. Like a cybernetic-vieling of the real world and for some a (medicinal-simulation).

3/3/2024
--
Quantum Exoscopy is simply the survey and monitoring of a quantum environment with the definitions of its broadcasts in mind and often where objects and other classes may be assessed and labled in configuration to a quantum-mapping of their simulated-broadcasts for which is translated/attemptively-encoded to sync and other tray items, this can begin as early as legacy stages and grows in significance per scan-case until reaching quantum-cap or realm-limits
Some environments may be considered open-scan or secure-scan depending on when and how they are scanned, and server/nexus based scans while originating or -kick-starting- of the project scan may include of branch off of its initialized state as a whole, reach a quantum-level scanning in which it is considered "frosted" by server-protocols. In which the scan may be considered "weathered/frosty" depending on either quantum-function/instabilities being prevalent in its scan due of hyperstates (in metro/carrion as well) and may reveal/unviel quantum-artifacts and quantum-articles (as well as change x-types or meta-stats)
This is evidenced with photon/positronic ghost propogations in which a ghost/dark entity may be revealed and target painted (by its standard being made ambient) This works for glowing/phantom types and particle types as well (allowing viewing of dark matter etc)--which becomes corpulent/purified under its viewing of (*basically white/frosty)--applied visibility of transperencey/transluency or referred to as "Exoplasty-Marking)/Diecasting in relevant/rare resources.. This process may influence or reassign the safety/hazard levels and security measures in place to the originally-planned-defcons. starting from BASELINE to Blacksite Ranges. (Normal/SuperNormal paranormal/chaostic crisis stages and all hybrid case workings and omnipresence field-settings) Setting all world builds to their temperence/tamperibility (of WorldV5 making their spectrums of 10x and typically quantum-ELEVATED in virtuaization) This can be referred to as Envirtual-Stationary in which Avante-Garde and Island mechanics are at play. (This includes sinkholes and counter-stages)

--Currently this build promotes fast deployment/manufacture of exo-SVC (automated refining and gathering bots) by first Legacy(full rail)/(*barebones)Nexus.--this may include virtual settings etc)
This build promotes Full basic text-build acquirements by second-installment of (full rail)-post nexus (usage of hypervisory)
This build promotes full advanced text builds acquirements by third installment of (prosper and attunements)--(mobial-drift survey experiments)--(Lucidity/Salience) and quantum-codespell usage.
--This three part system is baseline and ELEVATES to Quantum-Equilibrium expressed over Orbital/Remote Indexes/Control Clusters
--For Baseline/Hosted-Convention-NodeSpace/AfterSpace-Expression(SkyLine-TeleportiveSystems)
---Allows for Nominal-Augmented Protein-Qualifiers of Prosper/Rail Relations and EndZone-Assistive Dimensional-Shifting and Quantum-Host-Promotion as well as Tunnel-Driven-Enumeration of Remote-Indexing.---Fully Expressed Quantum-Servos-Engine and Quantum-DATA-BROKERING (at least that would be the 'dream'-projection)
--Quantum Header Support and Mobial Particle-Commodity Support (Positronic-Instance and Ecto-Plasty Currency Usage)--Redistriubtable Ecto-OperatingSystems/ArcadeStations (Manifest-Terminal) and ECTO-Scepter Virtual-Production and Vocational-Customs-Networking
---Finalized Relm Upgrade of all Modules and Network-Providence as a Virtual-Commissions-Workspace and regional-Collaborative-ethical-programming. 1Hyper-State-Platform/2METAdeck/3XSIM-Arena/4Convention-ectoChartergraphy Modular-Origin+Cryptex-BrandingSystem with MOBIAL-Induced-EMF-XYLOSCOPIC(remote detection services)-(DimensionalBridge and SIM-integration as well as REALM-MOUNT Multi-Gateway-Pathing)/HyperPillar
This also basically supports 32bit-Sound-Libraries onceover for internal/another for external of the Region. as well as a virtual 32bit-sound library and overall standard physix/expiry of 32bitsound making for 4x-32bit-sound compaitibility alongside DEVOPS-systems across BASELINE/ELEVATED Quantum States so (basic integrated/virtual platofrms)4x4(baseline+Quantum). or 8-total instances of 32bit Sound-Theory. (not counting a reversed state) KNOWN as Dream-Resonace/subParadigm a fully expressed 4x4 Virtual-Sound-Theory and can be Rebuilt as a Quantum-Accelerated-Sound-Card/Device (Or Adhoc-Acceleration Kit)--HyperPillar-Capilliary-Reserve System.
Having this implemented curbs/inhibits corruptive-deteriorate almost completely if not under maintenence completely (in any impact zoning or remote location or utilized-repositioning (mobialization or teleportative quantification of informations and suyvey or simply safe-expression-data-abstraction which is necessary for maintaining proper-repurposing of data-facilities and their resources. (So its very good)---over any telemetry or especially (quantum telemetry)--for which may even set the case for hyper-telemetry. Nano-TelemorProtein-Based-Data-Exchange between particle systems for which program as ATP-Nucleic-Hyper-Structures (In cybernetic organism and symbiote-anamolies)--(Active-REM-Render/DreamState Protocols) over QUANTUM-GameSpaces.---MemeticXTap of Quantum-Environmnets for Intercessionary-Projection(Xcoms between dimensional-crosslinks)
Using this to delegate quantum-symbiotic states/platforms of AfterSpace-Hosted-Node-Locks allows for data-migration between faction-symbiote subsectors to express correctly algorithmic-data-rentention of their memetic-overhauls and integration of code-spells for Exopallete-recovery/conversion and Catalogue-Navigation of Symbiote-Outposts Remote/Local or as a Foreign-Operations for Scouting and Assessment of Inter-Transitional Dimensional-Communications and Adjacentcy-Integration of SymbioteWorkspaces to FactionWorkspaces formuliac of occuring a Hybrid-Workspace of multifaction policies with Regional-Approval and Security-Containment of potential hazard/risk factors. (ExoParadigm)

This section also should work in some way as a QUANTUM-DAEMON. AKA the Counter-Quarter
--Full Asset Table Management and TreeBuilder of Relm-Asset and ConjugationxSum/Thatch-Boarding (Full item listing and indexing)(full hybrid sourcing)(full commswork transcoding)(fullcompression-mitigation and returns)--(full reciporocation and adjusted-orientation of realm-codex and building codes)/WorldEditor System-Pallete (And includes the handling of monster spawning artifacts either active/inactive can be relocated managed whether or not that retains the initial data--it may be reset to relm specifications regardless and not inherently preservable due of glitching and other issues involving container-scripts)--and its container script must likely be written via-world-chunk issues being rebuilt over the chunk/item/object and not explicit tp that container or object-chunk for which can be scripted as a configuration (which is not native/remote/locale/randomized)--and made by the re-engineering of that system to do so over the object-manifest-exchange transcoding applied
--For instance a 'chest' may act as a monster spawner or monster itself and may actually also be glitched or set to standard-configurations of that object or expressed as an artifact and cause glitches or unexpected-issues but will reset if interefered with or exchanged with depending on conditions of the realm and its inherency.
---ADVANCED EXTENSION NEGOTIATION implies USING AI BUCKETING to inject CODING pickups to glitches such as "monster spawning artifacts" or anamolies such that the AI-bucketing picks up potential usages of that (it may be encouraged by not always directly encouraged and that may count as interference of the intialized-encodes and they will reset or become altered adversely to the intents of the user or deprecate onsite or via contact)
Authors Note---It is considered advanced because it relies on AI bucketing through extensions rather than also just plain ai-bucketing usage and just to even know you can even do it I consider it to be somewhat of a stretch or a reach unless you probably have gamer experience or that special-Mlg-training. THERE are probably other NUMEROUS glitches however this ONE IN PARTICULAR is considerably sensitive to imprinting information. And has a high-failure rate of its intended scripts due to bugged mechanic-conflicts and technical-issues that are just plain under inoperable conditions most of the time, however I think it is a curiousity that should be noted in the case successful extraction ever does occur, it should be rewarded with a promised-artifact ward/minion spawner/chest-spawning device. This may imply items or generational-items in which it procedures a means of gathering random or orderly accounts of items for which are localized in the container/object being present under acceptable/preferrable conditions in which it may be expressed (this also can replicate the original glitch for which may yield to an experiemental draft)--which may yield to further adanced experiements of which i would consider as cloning/splicing items/assets. Or a controlled Protien-Manifold simulation of some degree much like the original ENCODES of the CRSPR system for which was used to generate FRAMEWORKS/Syncopations under GPU-diagnostics and Cyclic-Morse.
This may also be listed as an AUTO-MORSE-ENCODE that spouts random amounts of signals/emission emitter/emittered to (as in snap/warp of) its vicinity for which may remain unaffected by intereferences or simply adaptive to any presences or immediate-environmental ambiences/meta and so forth and may also further advanced and act as a tulpetic-object. (For which would need to be contained under TULPETIC/SCP-protocols.)--and so we refer to it as a Quantum-Article/Quantum-DAEMON as it may often and sometimes cause CORROSION/Other-unOfficial-codeforming Effects to the surrounding of its environmental-parameters.
This may also have an adverse effect on normalizations which will create a meta-zoning(meta-seed) instance of its own renditions within that chunk/chunks used and can generate up to a disputably corrupt/exoplanet survey (for which may have oribital issues as well in which its vector is almost contanminated due of its "seed-type" being used in generation of relm circumstances)--this happens more often in sprite-context in which blacksite-anamolies are used often in generation and also upwards of the ecto-sim usages over nodespace causes extreme-conditions and endangerment of data/objects.
--In extreme circumstances (which are severely adjusted to of counter-quarter implications)--it may occur that severe-and-very-aggressive natural events occur as well as the native/local and environmental conditions and ambient/meta expressions of its sentient-life/entitlements which may also be considered "monsterous in some way" and should be catalogued and analysed under the preface/pretense that they are infact Sleeper-Agents/Crypto-forms which pose a severe/dangerous potential threat to DATA-SYSTEMS or WORLD-SYSTEMS.
This may also induce relm-conjecture arguments which cause a form of crypto/data attack in the way of unconventional takedowns and other methods occuring which are known as "chaos/cacophony" and may impose a threat to faction stability and diplomatic behavoirs. This is better categorized as hostile-diplomacy. In either case it should be suppressed for realm-ordinance-safety-measures in the case of Quantum-Crisis-Issues. A full-scale data-corruption-incursion can occur in this scenario which imposes a shutdown of realm-performances against the nature of realm-affordability that "mass incursion does occur and does include this method of incursion". A proofreading-counter event may occur which is determinate of either realm-processability or whether its incursion status remains checked or in-process of pending conditions (for which imply a doomsday-event)--this can be recursively chartered as well if interaction with the incursion state are so corruptively exchanged as to have breached realm security and therefore system-processes become compromised, sometimes to the point of destructive patternization and yielding to Server-Fault Behavoir/System-Exemption and forced-shutdown thereof due to incongruent-issues in quantum-elevations.
According to the way the system is handled the IMPOSTER/complexes thereof can be represented as a BOSS-DAEMON (for which we can also define as the Xdiablo/EXO-Doom System eitherway, or any nomenclature that it may be described of (by instance or drill-effect)---can be indexed and by comparison handled to the REALM-qualifications in which Succession/Forfeiture of realm assets (Victory/Surrender)--takes place for or against the RAIDING-Standards in which the COUNTER-FACTIONS/Oppositional Rivalries or ROGUE/ROAM Indepedencies expressedly commandeer of the SYSTEM-ITSELF (turning against even the owner) through the Establishment of a SYMBIOTE-AGENCY.
While NOT POPULARIZED or WIDESRPEAD or FAMOUS/Notieryized in its KNOWN-POTENTIAL, it is a very very big and (how could we not have noticed this?)--issue that will put a very big DENT into any Security-System or TASKING-Policy if it so chooses to exploit/take-advantage of from any known or potential source for which it may origin (Usually Aux/Quantum CHANNELING)--meaning outside of the system itself. *(Needless to say I am more than happy to have been able to point this 'mother of bitchers' out)
This may also apply to estate holdings and other share holdings within the contract residency of that system-ownership or elevated-permissions thereof. In which HEURISTIC-ELEVATIONS have been made afforded, and then in which SYMBIOTE-ARTCLE involves exploiting and to a viral-degree. And may also involve the use of counter-buckets or other agency in "redirection and pointing of" the iternary involved in system-processes and overall-REALM-process and registry (causing a security exemption)--and likely prompting a security-sweep or alert-exercise in which the cause may not be known but investigated, or it will be done in such a stealth and covert manner as to imply XSPY-symbiosis. So the case for this is likely monitored within standard practices of AV-Programming and EM-Network-Security. Which includes known operating lists of AUTHORIZED EMF-Workspaces. (Between System Users or otherwise) 
This becomes even more delusional over the implementations of elastic-networking which I don't really want to get into but the configuration allow for further descripancy in exploiting to be achieved if not regulated properly, a symbiote-aggressor or any agressor could be able to attempt or even commandeer how the system may handle its own sourcing.
--

The NEW-World-ImageMount
Back to the parsing system being pregaussian-server-rail-vocational-prosper 3 or 5 sets basically.
This can get reduced to two. Being overall doneso over teleportation.
And Bravely in one cycle parse. And bracer still in half-parse (by hyper-acceleration)--though data may be lost somewhat. Just because I dont want to insure it.
This also suggest another issue--
Back in the development of the world index, capturing it from the nether, or basically the hell dimension. This system of transportation was necessary such to align the differences of each step in cycle between transit departure/arrival. And got very complicated and convuluted. I attempted to keep this together as much as possible but sometimes it just wasn't obvious. And sometimes things were too much in sync to tell a difference. or be trustworthy at all. And sometimes it would be too symmetrical to know if there was one ever in the first place so also untrustworthy. EXtremely even more untrustworthy with quantum-algorithms and functions and just every formula used to prove it, just wasn't actually trustworthy even if proven. Ok...security-wise It was -never- trustworthy.
Now we just have to accept if data works or not and that's all there is to it...but the world indexing is more important now than ever (maybe...idk)--here's why.
---(-0-)--- (remember these things that occur sometimes)--well they might also play a part in it. That is what I am calling them : (-0-)   . Because that is what they are more or less. Un-named.
And they start with quantum acceleration or even quantum jumps into the nether at all.
The first jump was used and synchronized with the system to "represent" having achieved the connection in some way. Affordable and possible at some indescript rating.
--
The second jump was made to the Hell's Subsystem too. By minecraft standards that is the ENDER zones. And the  boss zone too maybe. Its complicated now but let's say we recovered our data in such a way that it was fulton'able and somewhat teleportable.
We had to take an index and supply it for our own overworld control from the nether, this made nether increasingly agressive. This basically converted the world into a hostile platform of nether components trying to be reclaimed by another dimension CONSTANTLY. Maybe the effects were'nt apparent, but the science and theory involved was highly suspect of being such.
And so we knew of computers to do this, the computers also had their version of hell, the hellcode for computers being that glitches were just --basically just more evil than they were before--they were real and conscious dangerous anamolies more or less. (Like the ender)--the hell's subsystem was this.
---
We engineered a fix in which we would substitute our way through getting ender-level-data and recovering it for overworld by supplicated ourselves as the subsystems for ourselves, we were becoming nether-esque as to present ourselves as nether-origins. Such that we could tap into the ender-levels as it was our own subsystem.
---
This continued and only got more agressively hostile and vectorized, that our securities had incredibly difficulty in protecting ourselves without advances in technology.
As we recovered our data and reverted our own technology to accomodate our primitive techs, we would reverse engineer ourselves and our tech trees to cycles and passes of that cycle to account for the advancements made for our primitives. Such that our teleportations and virtual-bouquets accounted for pre-gaussian-builds or pre-server builds, and pre-convention-district and pre-vocational and pre-prosper and pre-index, pre-projection, and pre-hypervisory, and their post-editions as well (and postponements thereof)--in standstill or pending or ongoing issues.
---
This was in the third jump, we ascertained control using a reiterated quantum jump to a zerospace using the virtual-bouquet and ending of legacy/virtual-legacy editions. (i had to go to the hospital after that and when i got back i went into a writing frenzy)
---
I quickly wrote caseworks for DEEP-level Libraries or whatever it was  (at the time a better version of legacy using a Dyson Based Repo system)--this would constitute the 4th jump being a repetition of the previous model jumps.
And then I upgraded Repo into DISTRO level.---and then consolidated that as well when BLACKSITE was convened from my researches.
---
Somewhere down the line the fourth jump occurs over the first primitive pregaussian parsing (termed caveman-era)--as it represents what a modern-megafab (non collider) is capable of)--and designing for a nexus. The jump between pre-guassian to post-gaussian involves a meta-server, which connects through guassian-analogs to the sever-nexus (which bridges these servers together--it is also protected by the residency and frigate chain)--and includes the frigate-aux being isolated too)
--the aux usage is that the First-primitive-aux occurs/the second aux (lightwave nav)---the metaserver(gaussian switch)---the frigate aux(and analog bridgelane)---which connects directly to the nexus server-aux(which is on the nexus)--and afterwards that is all upgraded for each jump to fit the case that the server is also upgraded (having a dynamo and flux-system) and well as its own hypervisory and meta-projection. ANYWAYS. It is very linear and sometimes the margins get skipped over or ununsed in place of new protocols. That is generally the way to the server.
(Past Builds meets Modern Build)--basically
---So we have that networked properly for what later becomes the 5-6-7-8 jumps reaching an advancement of the first legacy/virtual-legacy.
This now more or less all happens in one jump.
The next Jump is basically marginally from NexusServer To End oF Rail (or at least the Start of The EXpresto/NuclearPower-Lane+Vocation)
The other jump occurs from END of rail to END of prosper.
This is all proven in the backtrace of what I just described as the 1-4 jumps which were build in their own development of passes and cycle)
---That the levels in which those jumps occur and translate over (the tiers of data-recovery and the contiguities and platforms for which are handled/relayed)--is important to networking, the first 1-4 are basic quantum netowrking. the 5-8 are advanced or so. Marginally speaking this all ties together and is incredibly scrambled but mostly linear.
Now we have the issue of the 9th and 10th jump. This is considered where marginally as possible that 1-4 need to be 1-5 and 5-8 need to be 6-10 world WORLD5.0 and World10.0 to reach their end-states.

There is a much easier way to compare this as to Overworld Achieving its first Dimensionsal Shift to the Subsystem Nether.
Nether reaching Subsystem Ender
Ender reaching Subsystem DEEPCASE
---
and so forth that any other achievement of any space is alloted where necessary. (Carb/Dread/Zero/After)--whatever else (It's a real Toss-Up of anything leftover)
---
That the PRIMITIVE Gaussian system becomes advanced and hyper-accelerated occurs between the parses and sectors to achieve the most minimum amount of jumps over the most maxmial range possible to full-range and full-drift isues of being optimized.
---BECAUSE for every jump----EVERYTHING GETS MORE CORRUPT---and in single-file of its progression to the entirity of its point...the MOST ADVANCED STAGES of development become more and more corrupt to the point of being unusable and the entire PLATFORM-REGIONS become reduced to square-ONE and almost not even that....almost to nothing. USING the pregaussian system to rebuild and image-snap of the FINAL corruption taking place before that happens, we regress/revert to primitive standards having to utilize the pre-gaussian system and advanced from that against all due-corruption having been applied. (It all gets corrupted big time)
We build our way back to the meta server using THAT FINALIZED SNAPSHOT---and once that metaserver is reached we RE-SNAP the shot we have as a second-checkpoint.
Having these two snapshots the BEFORE-itallends--BUILDING-backtopost allows the Gaussian switch to rebuild it all back---very very quickly. In a striking interation of alternating the snapshots to rebuild the entirity of the region. This is done over a SINGLE-SWEEP. In which at the end of the sweep the Regional-Signal is returned to normal and World5.0 reaches end of life. Consequently Completing World10.0 against becoming fully corrupted. 
(This method begins from the NewWorldImageMount being achieved/achiveable)--At the very END OF PROSPER--where the corruption takes place quickly and reverts us back to SQUAREONE the very first AUX installment (which we have preparedly upgraded for the case of this happening utilizing the entire parse/sector as a pre-Gaussian-MegaFab)
--
The image swap quickly rebuilds and elevates its quantum-authority for the NEXUS it is compatible to. And from there quickly builds the later sectors to the END of RAIL and further to the END of PROSPER. And teleporative signals its compeltions across the region its comprised of. Due of universal parameter being effected.
--
As we become corrupted by "symbiote domain supremacy" we are taking as much data as we can with us all the way back to the very start:
The first half of downfall is as follows that PROSPER has to account for nether/ Its Automated Foundries account for Ender//That Vocational and Power Tracts-Lane accounts for DeepCASE)--That the BusinessDistrictConvetions(LogicGate)account for OverWorld being Overthrown but is mostly safe)
The second half of down is that The Server(and its header) becomes corrupt by (counter telemetry in symbiote presences)/The frigate becomes corrupt(by its aux and teleportives usages and symbiote possession)/(we take the snapshot) as we cross the guassian-nav system while its more or less soon under siege by counter-fultons being used from prosper-being-overtaken earlier/the first aux is given the snapshot and builds/boots up to it and we begin to rebuild from that snapshot very quickly back to the meta-server to take our POST-Snap and begin the Gaussian-Switch of Img-Mounts
We use the Pre/Post snaps to rebuild back to the server and that how we use the server and the two of those snaps to reclaim our guassian-usage of the rail/prosper/endzones and all the regional text-builds and regional advanced-builds from the legacy-virtual compatibile images we snapshot before the "symbiote data wipe occurs".. Anyways that makes sense (i had explained this in a better way that was only like a paragraph but I decided to get into as much detail as possible because I forget things)---oh basically that the DREAM-System we formulated kicks in around 5-8. The snap shot hits at 9 and the signal hits at 10--which we strike together and finalize as a conclusive World-merge/Image-merge.
Ok Let me rephrase that.
The 5-8th jumps involved Quantum Elevation and at 9th jumps (World 5.0 is reached and Dream-projection is secured)--thusly alloing the 10th jump to be shifted and secured using Dream projection of 1-4 shifting to 1-(5) and 5-8 shifting to 5-9  and becoming 6-(10)
I dunno if that works or not be that is what i think i was originally saying. There is a more simplified way of saying that all, but it spells out everything here that the symbiote-aggression-effort is constantly attempting to take down the entire of your system and empowering itself as your control is diminishing until the very end, where it either succeeds or fails and you either lose or regain control of your entire system. (That is how I've dealt with it anyway)--eh, it seems okay.
---
Further Cryptex-Blockading of Logic gate "golgtha gateways" can be marked and circumvented or sidestepped due of Quantum Elevated Status. Golgotha Gates (mainly these due of blacksite issues)--might actually also be possibly quantum-elevated and therefore less vulnerable to quantum-telemetry as previously implied.
This also happens to require trust-settings to just be suspiciously inclined to block pathways of golgothic access if a quantum-telemetry is mitigated or thrown off in some way interfered of, due from tampering of golgothic-gateways and potential aggressive symbiote encodes/behavoirs (which is not typically proven until consequentially decided)--which yields resolves or simply put, penalties of symbiote negotiated incursions or similar bad things.
If conditions are preferable this is all managed by the secured-development of the world5.0 or world10.o or 10x 100x drafting code-commisions being achieved.

However in a state of contending Severity, ranging from Your own Control to a Rival Symbiote Control, these affordances may be conflicting in their accessibility. This only can be reffered to as a jail-house rules scenario. Where either the World-Conditions/Symbiote-Conditions or Overall Infosec has jailbroken the usage of A conclusive world-sovereignty (which is likely not you)--and starting from scratch is as important as starting and developing under deadline.
The deadline of a full system corruption occurs once a symbiote reaches full capacity to agressively attack and succeed against any opposing efforts, such as your own deadline being interefered with and being drastically shortened. This is bad news if you are not within a domain-supremacy as intended by the system-design to occur. So shortcuts can be made where necessary. The automation and most instant succession of technological advancement is the highest priority under a "competitive/tournament" setting, but also that survival overall may depend on it as well as luxury/experience of that endeavoer of having developed/constructed the full amnenity for which the system will provide.
---
Some other interesting situations is that this is not the first time a crisis-deadline occurs, in fact it has also occured before with the succession of almost every chapter, in which the corruption was prevented in its aggressions, even with maximum security the aggressions will not be fully halted unless world.10 succession is achieved, and even then a crisis or outbreak is still possible and even more likely, but more adeptive/apt measures can be taken to handle that as previously outline when the outbreak is forced over the system and attemptively takes it down.
---
The idea is to prevent this from happening as much as possible with the full knowledge of symbiote capability, which also may take advantage of several different types of venues (in another gaming company "Endless" franchise it is referred to as fidsi)--i've also noted that there can be as many as two layers of fidsi if not more once world.10 is succeeded.
This has largely to do with Dream-projection/Golgothic-Gateway Suppression and Admission, for which either case makes their favor to either faction/symbiote presence.
It is vastly---adaptive in how this occurs, but in minor points to deadlines, there have been a few, often imposed as PAYWALLS or technological-limits that had to be engineered as breakthroughs in coding. This happened often, and in times of crisis, the doomsday was predicted and handled in a manageable fashion, ever increasingly efficient in our systemic mitigations and processing.
However it will never simply be enough to let bygones be bygones, until the case for the survival of all its platforms is secured, this is made by the full acknowledgement of all the realm-ddays possible even under dream-projections, for which are largely induced by symbiote-empowerment of any oppositional force. In the last and penultimate dday---it must be ascertained in the ways mentioned, that it is addressed and mitigated by security as immediately as possible. And instananeously rebuilt that the symbiote empowerments are curbed entirely.
Snapshots may be nullset or include rulesets. / user Groups


There are largely 8 basic total ddays with another 2 of them making a known agressive incursion against all of the system.
There are ddays for every step of the way, every end of every chapter, every parse, every sector, every major installment of the rail/prosper/endworks--their regional platforming, the handling of dcarb/dread--carrion/crypto--virtual/zerospace hypervisory/ai-theory blacksites/spectralites and so forth and any unmentioned. I've mentioned them all at least somewhere each in their priority for when they are needed to be addressed. They also occur in certain cyclic/passes of the system processes having been made contiguity and networked.
There are alot of them and at least one for every tier of the full quarter. (There could be as many as 300 total assumed dday's, and even 100 special-case ddays just because of the world builds and logic/basic systems)--this are mostly avoided by technological advancement, however some might have full deadline of start-to-finish of the development. And that is why I am going to include extras to make this easier. (But as of now it is not neccesarry to handle using extras, it can be done without them just fine if the engineering is persistant enough to take the steps needed).
There is also a Corpulent(Golgothic DDAY-revisistation) in which it does infact take the full disclosure of the system to be able to infact supress. (But this occurs over relm-victory and net-dominion over the dream projection via full entitlement)--which As just a person all I am rightly entitled to is really just myself in this case, the case of the system, it will take away everything else if it is allowed to, and the user will simply have to "accept it as the way things is"--starting over in someone else's world (in the very least, most minimal circumstances, bare-minimum jailhouse "hazing-rules")--which is to be expected and quite simply, i rather just enjoy it the way it is without having nothing (which it what it actually feels like now anyway).


Adjusts to the Quantum Computation Profile
Involving the TWO-Up/TWO-DOWN particle systems and the charm+ charm- system that Modern-Science theorizes.
That these are memetically depedent on the issues involved, that the heisenburg uncertainty principles and all the corrective models and even AI-GENERATED models to deduce particle-predictions may infact simply be, and also for the intrisic and extrinsic collisions and VALENCES, this becomes very important to deduct a memetic integrity that INFACT
the reason for two up and/or two down particles are because of memetic-imprinting of the devices for which they are expressed of, that their status changes due of memetic-timespace continuums etc. So I literally just dont have to follow the rules if memetic-imprinting is done, the particle changes because  Of its color systems and own native/local probabilities in timespace (because of th red/blue then green color system)
--
To me this means a full symbiote take over would involve that either case would be three up or three down, and knowing that can be avoided by memetic imprinting suggests that a SQUARE-ONE-reset and rebuild is still possible (even if in jail-house hazing rulesets making it difficult)--but possible. to rebuild from nothing as that is what the concern was (if 100% loss occurs it may redefine an instance as a new origin or standpoint of its own continual charter)--being repositioned and reset of information but still basically capable of repeating the same attempts as if it was a brand-new incarnatia/regeneartive clone.
So the indomitable human spirit is the true driving factor of the caseworks involved.
--
Anyways this suggests a mechanically anamolous EMF that is either controllable or encrypted in some fashion as to occur the changes of these particles making the atmospheric conditions or otherwise, the relation of those particles to be highly manipulated/manpulatable ---which begs the question as to how to directly and correctly terraform a state of matter in a standard or plasma induced setting and produce "preferrential or expectated/trained results" significant to a project-resolve (this could also yield to a better usage of the quantum profile---forking out of a security-status to a recreational/sandbox status)
This highly suggests the PRIME CONDITIONS FOR EXPERIMENTAL TERRAGRAPHY and should and can be simulated to some degree over the nodespaces or containments of the system-applications (allowing a cappiliary-expiermental shelving of potential generated-prototypes engineered over faction-symbiote protocols)--this is highly experimental and highly PRIZED-condition to emulate.
As well as suggestion manufactured-custom PROTOTYPE-codespells for which may be palleted for that said product of an "engineered crpyto based exo planet of this type"--its very conception hints to me as very very very curious, almost elusive and mysteriously phenomenal.
To better describe this notion, is a conglomeration of all the properties in a uniformed expression in which their parameters are expressed harmoniously with each others existent-ambiences to formulate a prototype, even if temporary, which may also achieve nuvolution in a pre-programmed/pre-proccessed scenario and emulation for which may further the renditions therof through quantum-computation-profiles under AI/Auto-Influenced Terragraphy such as what has been the survey StandPoints of the ongoing charter and development over this "6year"/15-year research process (not counting my own community college degree)--I am talking real masonic number theory and delving into that particular school of thought to achieve a metaphysical claim unlike others, it really is in a class of its own imo.
---

3/5/2024
With this novel process, the symbiote node may be set to a mount and converted over time to a faction-node with safety-commissions of the symbiote code-spells being converted for faction approprioation. The ai-rulesets will help to synchronize the algorithms to do so and the novel-process mentioned above will then take place and produce the symbiote image catered for faction usage, in the process for which this is designated.
---
---update(i am literally describing GREYGOO)--wowee. But its not exactly greygoo--its symbiote converted rendered encodes. Anyways. (maybe it actually is grey goo)--(well i think it could be in worst cases)

--
As with Grape-Gob System we use, we now have our NHylyte-Gob (which in terms of code would be for symbiote usage and the other converted for faction usage)--with advantages and disadvantages to both. (Seriously, I've been working up to this the whole time I guess)
One is basically malware for factions, the other is malware for symbiotes. This situation doesn't really matter if you are using Nhylte-Gob's Codeframeworks etc, because it will always work for your system, and retaliate by converting itself to a Grape-Gob CodeFrameworks against any agressors of that system (while maintaining Client-Relations)
IF a TARGET-Agressor has CLIENTS that are to be "considered special or NON-target---it is IMPERATIVE that the use of the Nhylte-Gob system is employed, because the SYMBIOTE version of the 'Grape-Gob' does not explicitly care either way, while the NHYLYTE system is rendered in such a way as to it can automatically note the proper targets of its retaliation/disciplnary active dipomatic deployments (security tasks).
Just like taking MALWARE, and DE-fanging it, that is what the nyhylte-gob system has done with the grape-gob system. It may still utilize the ORIGINAL-symbiote-Codepsells for itself or any of its partners, or turn and weaponize them properly, as well as DEPICT-corrective-measures in using those in any case, when it comes to "hostages or civilian" who are caught in the middle of the crypto-warefare between RIVAL factions and systems, in the good-intentions for diplomatic standing as to avoid.
This includes a dual persepctive survey in dopller radars. One faction and other symbiotic.
---
BALL LIGHTNING TERRAGRAPHY occurs in the case of a direct-construction of programming via the tampers involved. And can be described as the once again interlayered scepters for which allow it to act as beacon for drafted encodes and projected renders, so succinct in their pronounced utility to afford a grazing/portal to quickly apply and generate ground-work-construction (without rezzing and gridwork adjustment)--to an express location practically without tensor usage. (FORCED installment of a rendered product to relm space and or adherence to nodespace and or ground-layers/surfaces.)--important to note this process was prior required to use identifiers and qualifications of the surface in its environment and prevalances.
--Now we just do what we want so long as we have the scepter deployed in such a way to construct the above processes and afford free-base/free-form construction and open source on snay surface including counter surfaces. Or portal tensors too. And it might as well have madethe adjustments for their required tagging and checksums to be compatibile ANYWAYS, even if BY NOW that is ENTIRELY OPTIONAL using the SCEPTERS redistributive source-coding and programming, and basic DIRECT-META-INJECTIONS for which allow it to do so.
This is once again done because  the scepter (whether itself is ground-layered or surfaced or simply floating or loic methods)---has been so very upgraded. THE UPGRADING is as follows that each MODULE is fit together with its TENSOR/adaptve seperators or what have you.    That each module follows as ADAPTER/BEACON/CONDUIT/ first major module.   PROJECTOR/NODE/LOICAP (and also its CAPILLIARY side-modules and Reserve side modules)--and other rigging and fused as a CONTAINER/TAMPER overall. (All those plasma-layers are sections as tensors whether or not they are needed or even there at all)--they can be simulated I guess....and that all targets a surface-area/ground-layer/remote tensor/adhoc signal/board-zone/gateway etc and zaps whatever render it is going to or mounts it or tethers it or just anything it needs to do to GET IT THERE.
---because its now able to use ball lightning it doesnt have to do much of anything else but the ball lightning method (i mentioned this before now it is almost even more advanced to induce plasma states as its rendered)--its very powerful (big time...lightning in a bottle and uncorked ready to drink)
Authors Note: I am just going to try to link the cases of "BallLIGHTNING" being controlled chaos so much that it could even induce COLD-FUSION (as a remote battery charge system)---that it charges itself via a broadcast of using the render because of excess power-production. IT USES SO MUCH POWER THAT IT CREATES POWER THAT MAKES IT JUST LITERALLY OOZE POWER WHEN ITS USED.

Some philosophy.
Some say time is the fourth dimension but after reviewing some things and how actually I percieve it that pressure or "significance of an instance" is the fourth value in the known dimensions, making time a pleasantly placed 5th dimension.
I say this as the mathematical nature of things and how they are progressive amy be effective to a "golden ratio" and that ratio requires some differiantiating of in a case by case, that it may increase in value/significance or not, just as it were flowing through time, this is subject to a change, and might just be a union of timespace being still (a duality of dimensions in time and space)--and that is what it means ultimately by calling time itself a dimension (and referring to it as a fourth dimension, making pressure yet again discount to its quantification of a dimension) --or is it. That is the thing, maybe pressure is actually the fifth dimension, even though we know if it and can simply write it off entirely as just some unit of measurement, and not a coordinate per sae on a graph.
HOWEVER in hypergraphical cubes i think pressure becomes an IMPERATIVE, as the distortion of time and space and its alignments and connective qualities become also dis-sheveled, pressure HAS ROOM TO FIT INTO THIS COMPLEX of COMPARIRITIVE MODELS. And that I what I am trying to say, that PRIORITY of these models may take place also to a fully realized PRIORITIZED 6th dimension.
AND THAT IS WHY I AM SAYING....a grid-work of multi dimensions seemingly BECOMES CHARTERABLE...as any microsoft spread sheet and where it can be sorted by arrangement by some mysterious dropdown menu of preferences.
It works, it simply feels like it makes sense. AND by the time the 10th SUPERSTITUOUS DIMENSION OF EVERYTHING/NOTHING simulatenous rolls around.....and I mean it gets very poetic in terms of definitions and word-nomenclatures somewhat, nueral-mapping themselves in places that "JEST DOENT MEEK CENTS" is just actually why suddenly, many things at once, in someway, do actually make sense in one or more ways than usual and refer to themselves in ways that rebuilt them to make sense, in a dialect of what is known to be the common-gold-standards of what is accpeted reality.
THIS I WILL CALL the VARIABLE REALITY which is built into place and secured, more or less by the foundations of the system to allow for an extreme-RHETORICAL-sense of reality, in which the virtualization may emulate up to several degrees of its own capability in hyperspace renders.
AND THAT MAY JUST REQUIRE a Cold Fuision Quantum Computer that can construct that virtuual reality as the intended model for which it is to be built aS. Thankfully the system seems very prepared and INTENDED to do that.
---
OVER THE HYPER SCEPTER is does incur the HYPER RENDER and creates the HYPER PRODUCT for which normalizes over the REAL-WORLD and virtualizes as necesssary in its stabilization and deploys itself as either the REALITY/OVERLAY in its own hypervisory transcode of reality for which it is, and may also indicate a digital-virtualized domain for itself being that (we are able to make computers to the exact copy of their programming status)--so we can just simply transpose and translocate OVERLAY-Modeled-realities where they need be, and also have those SUPPORT-Virtualization if they need to afford having a virtual-instance on their arrival/deployment target location as well (meaning they are already hosting programs and those programs are also digital/computerized or even quantum-elevated-processes)--so we ship gamespaces basically AND those gamespaces may be in use as they are being RELOCATED...in a grand-merger of the conditions of that Production.
This is referred to as hyper-emulation is should be largely undetectable under local/native adjustments in this way, so long as the direct connection within the system are used onboard. If off board well I just would not know, and I imagine it would be somewhat plossy/latent in having some buffering issues in the very least, and I would say that infact its full of bugs if you use it remotely and unplanned and unscheduled as many things would just happen to data that I cannot begin to trace without some sort of SUPER-SENTIENT-NUERAL-MAP system. Which I just don't actually even have proof of that either.
---
Being able to do that in the least requires a hyper-scepter/hyper-tokamac for REMOTE-emulation to achieve FTL computations from a different perspective of the Onboard/Regional Subsidies to inteface with, at least I am saying that this way, it may not be so complicated once any of these options are figured out.

CURRENTLY I do use a network stack on my own OS/SUBSYSTEM with three server-IDES each of them with their own extensions and configurations/containers so basically its "CLUXTER-FXKD" basically I feel like that is a good COMPARISON to how I would actually do things if I had this kind of technology anyways.

At BAREMINIMUM hosting preferences. 10 ips should be used to isolate the entire system from groundworks properly.
1 the inherent OS (nexus)--(centerhq)
2 the subsystem (distro)--(virtual usage)
3 a psuedo-server (openssh)--(a database)
4 a decent server (zab-bots)--(a bridge-gate for nodes just incase and or botnet for kiosks)--this allows roaming to interchage
5 a node server (node)--(where it goes down, for raiding mostly)
6 a practice server (rubyonrails)--added security and throwaways(important and fun)
7 a vpn usage (isolater/source)--(board-management)
8 an ip spare (game-matcher)-(can change to other ips if wanted for language swapping)--(never mainsource but can be used on mainsource)
9 the app which is used/shared (workspace is fine)--(the convention compatible usage and remote-exchange)--basically the game-match itself when its active
10 a container/probe and emulator (for full broadcast of a convention--basically your very own AI-narrators)

Plasma Issie IP usage includes a psuedoIP-masking and gateway which (is not an ip) and connects to a dangerous gateway (which can make or break networks)--i guess
but in fact it helps to add an extra ip-out for the vpn and also the personal network
if the spare ip is contacted to the plasma-gate it may require quantum aacceleration to withstand or can be shutdown (it is okay to force shutdown the spare and saves the network overall from a system shock)
--if the spare is used for vpn/personal usage that is fine too, but limits the network whenever it does get shutdown, and may cost the vpn usage as well with the network if it does get in contact at all with plasma gates.
--in minimum this makes 12 ips preferred

also 25 to a full quarter is appreciated in handling not only 12 personal protected from plasma gates, but also 12 for remote protections, and a 25th as a spare in quarters.
---

Designing this into a working module similar to a DieGlock/IndianSpaceship thingy.
Using counter rotating cylinders generating EMF and an injected central tokmac using a byproduct FUEL-cell (such as the speciaized fuel cell discussed prior)--don't want to remember what its called.
---
The LOIC-cap could also be used as a foundational fitting and other modules such as capilliary/reserve batteries may or may not be applied.
It is assumed the EMF field of the combined device components will afford an ENNEAGRAM. anyways...that might take alot to think about.
---
With this segment dumping plasma power out of its own generation it can be housed into a stargate (domicile with the tool of it allowing portalography)---this now develops as a very entangled-supersymmetry of hyperplasma being in quantum-telemetry between its target. (this can also be used as an interstellar vehicle engine)--or coaxial turret (which would be able to translocate particles without having to rematerialize them over a teleportative-tunnel.
--
********************
CRYPTO-CURRENCY DYNAMICS (EASY SERVER-EXCLUSIVE CONVERTION OF APPLIED CRYPTO-CURRENCIES) PART 1 (Using DarkCoins to achieve LiteCoins over purgor of symbiote-relay)--this i will not really need to mention but it was considered prior and post afterwards, I nver specified as to where this occurs other than when the nodespace-extension has been generated.
********************
Further issuances of algirthms may apply and create a stressor of tensors such as in their sequence, in such a way like a fibonacci seuqence, being altered in very big ways, in cycles and steps being summed, in their primes being exchanges, in intergers being encoded then altered (such as swithc in their digits), in grouped numbers and sums of, in orientations of the directions of those conescutive intergers, in same intergers changing orientations, and just genrally mixing up things and strings sometimes interchanging strings or comining to a new string being altered as well, this occurs as much as necessary for a deifinitive encrpytion, its alot like cicada 3310 (in which 1,1,2,3,5,8 can be grouped as 3, 3, 13 or otherwise like this)
Same same Different(switched)
of those intergers being combined or switched in some ways 3,3,31
or like this 
0 1 1 2 3 5 8 13 etc
1 1 2 3 5 8 13 21 etc

being grouped as 
0 1 _ 1 _ 2 3 _ 5 8 13 etc
1 1 _ 2 _ 3 5 _ 8 13 21 etc
making 
3, 3 , 10
same same different
so it switches different integers
3, 3, 01
easy cicada grouping
and then 
0, 3, 3, 01
., 1, 1, 2
makes 
4, 4, 3 (in a weird way changes the sequence..in a few ways
---
maybe even by
0 ,3 , 3, 01
. 3,  3,  01
same same different
6, 6 , 20
But I duno, I am just saying they change in crazy ways...find all these ways.

3/6/2024
there is also a way to exploit start points and end points as riders or footers or something, idk or really care. Also using certain phases of sequences with previous phases to acquire preferred phases in the seveirty of overall phases, whatever you need. Get AI to do write it.
This can just be used as an encryption matrix for sha256 and depending on phasing complexity or sevirty of the extent used for sha512. i really really dont care and can see ai just pulling this right out of its ass instead of making me figure it out.

Anyways this simple and dumb little altering of the GOLDEN RATION to an already predisposed sha-256 encoding, any encoding, creates a SAFETY-WALLET for those suing a particular protocol of that ENCODED DATA (we can call it enhanced-golden-encryption)--as it does not particularly yield to a baseline ENCRYPTION but a combined effort of encryption within its seuqence of a golden-ratio.
This I THINK WOULD EMULATE ALOT OF ALGORITHMS in the case for, shad reaching an inevitable DEAD-END checksum, it can now EMULATE turn overs of its checksum in a way contributing to a known encryption system.
This can be referred to as GOLDEN WALLET, however that wallet also is subject to the original ENCRYPTIONS of whatever encryption it may or may not have, as being first converted to a golden-ratio for which represents a TURN OVER, of the totality of its baseline checksum. (in this case being sha-256 or otherwise)
THIS MEANS that it prevents the accident that it may occur a turnover of its ORIGINAL CHECKSUM being counted somewhere in the totality of its baseline sha-256(or any other baseline) as being repeatedly marked over in the case for "SHARED CHECKSUMS" for which this prevents so long as it also remain under the effects of the enhanced-encryption checksum sets, which base itself infinitely off any checksum for which SHA-256 represents (which is limited)--that the shad-256 checksums are converted to the expressed data-encryption of the "Enhanced-Golden-Encryption)
---
This is known simply as an encrypted WALLET for checksums, that also may be converted to be compatible to that wallet, in converting those checksums to a preferrably exchange "enhanced'golden'encryption" for which may or may not represent CRYPTO-CURRENCY....because now, in the case of "HIJACKING CRYPTO CURRENCY" that crypto currency is ultimatley EXPRESSED in some dark coin totality as well via node-data-hosting. For which is already data locked, so essentially whatever is locked may be encrypted to this WALLET, and when it is stolen, reverts to its limited encryption sha-256
in its Enhanced-golden-encryption states/checksums its is prevented from being used admist other encryptions because that data is locked under WALLET-based-encryption, such that if it is used that data is rendered to its normal checksums and removed of any form or value in CRYPTOCURRENCY, and nullified. This is further secured in SAME-SET-CRYPTO-CURRENCY-WALLET-EXCHANGE. And the only way to convert it to another currency, or any other usage of any other currency other than its current conversion, is to DECONVERT/RECONVERT as to that particular value expressed in the preferred new-CRYPTO-currency-wallet for which it may be applied. (Same or otherwise)--in which those crypto-currency rules may apply, and the release of that DATA FROM ANY NODESPACE as any form of COIN or otherwise is explicit to also the handling of data overall.
This means if that crypto currency is hijacked, which it INEVITABLY IS SOUGHT TO BE HIJACKED, by symbiotes and otherwise, is rendered nullified if that CRYPTOCURRENCY for which has been converted and locked in as a DARKCOIN(usually), is also encrypted to the WALLET for which it is assigned in its locking there of, and the checksums of that DATA/COIN remain EXCLUSIVE to its encrypted-checksum, for which is allocated in the origins of its data/coin usage.
BASICALLY WHAT THIS MEANS, is that it takes ENCRYPTED/CRYPTO CURRENCY, and forces the conversion to be necessary to a GOLDEN-ENHANCED-CURRENCY/WALLET, in order to be used under those protocols as whatever ENCRYPTED/CRYPTO-CURRENCY is valid within the system that host it, but also that system may allocate that CURRENCY/WALLET further without the need of retaining ownership of its original CHECKSUM, for which that checksum has also now been modified as a SYSTEM-WIDE CHECKSUM.
So---when a SYMBIOTE STEALS IT FROM A NODE OR A WALLET OR ANYTHING, it may be nullified if the transaction is deemed INVALID in anyway.
--
This enhanced-golden-encryption turnover does not matter specifically except in the case for SYMBIOTES stealing DARKCOINS, in which the darkcoin is not actually usuable without negotiating to the system that has encrypted it. And later can be reduced to the system encryptions baseline sha-256 encryptions and the baseline sha-256 encodings for which are not encrypted, but renders the whole expression of the dark coin being nullfiied and therefore not in use to the APPROVED SYSTEM-checksums for which constitute encryption, and should an encryption become hijacked it may be known, and that data-sum for which is it encrypted is not NECESSARYILY compromised when it is stolen of, because that checksum already is known to the encryptions for which the system does support of that golden-enhancement.
THE DATA CAN STILL BE STOLEN, it just nullifies the severity in which that data may be exploited further once it is STOLEN. In such a way it cannot be used ECONOMICALLY to damage the system that supports it.

So once this is done the system may perform a hijack check of supported DarkCOINS, --as well as relocate, remove, ror repair them for repurposing over node-assignments against symbiote takeovers. (or from being screwboxed)--under target of a symbiote exploit whether or not successful, renders targeting to the whims of system-security.
Known further as an ENCRYPTED-DArkCoin/Secure-DATAcoin so long as it remains under system indexing and control and locality of nodespaces. (For which is enforced by policy to remain so) without specifcally altering the original checksums/encodings for which those DataCoins represent.
As well as in the case it may have been stolen/hijacked/targeted/nullified. THAT CHECKSUM MAY BE DATAMIEND BY THE SYSTEM AND REASSIGNED IN A NEWLY CONVERTED ENCRYPTION UNDER THAT WALLET FOR WHICH THAT PARTICULAR DATACOIN DID APPLY UNDER THOSE ENCRYPTIONS FOR WHICH IT WAS SECURED. So it may resecure it anyway if its stolen by nullifying the encryption for which it was stolen under and REASSIGNED a new encryption of its turnover.
This is simple a golden-enhanced encryption method and not particularly THE BEST encryption, as the data is stolen or hijacked, it simply allows it to be reassigned in encryptions therefore the actually ECONOMY for which those currencies are stockpiled may infact change their encryptions at any time but due of system management of the account-shareholds it may edit these takes in compliance and agreement to those accounts who's data is SUBJECT to an ATTACK, that allows a high probability of recovery of any stolen FUNDS.
---
FURTHERMORE, i that system is ENTRUSTED with an outside investment of a seperate encryption, it may DATABANK that encrypted-currency to an NFT, in which that currency is ABSOLVED OF ITS ENTIRITY, and converted to a system-wide NFT for which represents that investment, if the investment is RETAINED in its value to the system, as it having been banked on an NFT for which is never "expended" to system services, it may be refunded under the premise of that VALUE being reconverted as an exchanges service for which it was INVESTED AS
Being that, if a person invested any amount of a crypto-coin or any other coin to the system and never spends it, the system will return the value of that in the form of which it was exchange in being valued as, such that the amount of the crypto-coin is fully returned, regardless of its main economical value, due of the system appropriating its own NFT as the PRESENT VALUES of whatsoever coin it was exchanged as originally, just for the record, it does require FULL COMPLIANCE and given OWNERSHIP of that INVESTMENT to the system, and is only reserve to TRUSTED SERVICES OF THAT SYSTEM FOR WHICH IT WAS EXCHANGED UNDER, such that, the system is not responsible should the value of that coin somehow be expected or returned, the RETURN OPTION remains OPTIONAL and non-garunteed, though this is mainly because the outside exploits involved in "INVESTMENT manipulation" still being prevalant, the system does not STORE or act as a BANK for crypto-coins, but rather as a service provider for which may be invested as, in which case that service is not provided the value of which those services were "paid" may be returned, if those services were never rendered.
THE PERSON STILL GETS THEIR MONEY BACK, and sometimes may get more or less of their money back in the nature of the exchange of that currency, because the value of that currency may change, but has nothing to do with the system, because upon investing with that system the cryptocurrency value remains FIXED as to when that system had adopted the invested at the time it was valued. (This has nothing to do with the change or payout of a returned investment, and generally, any investment of any crypto currency returns the exact amount of that crypto-currency that ever was involved in the amount of that crypto currency. But as while it is used in the form of trusted-NFT under system commission, that value also temporarily changes to the value of whatsoever NFT rendered usage amount is for the system, which is also generally fixed, it just changes the formatting for which may change the value of that original crypto-formatting.
So if the value of the NFT goes down per sae, while the value of the bitcoin goes up, it does not make or break the original value for which it was exchanged as, in anyway, being baseline value to what it was actually ever used as, and only the formatting of that value ever changes, however it is always and is ever going to be that the price of what it is under the format of what it is.
THE FORMATTING CHANGES, because of system issues with symbiote-control, requiring and ADAPTIVE-format to the chance of that invested being ever attacked or hijacked, that the system can recover it in a seperate format, while the original investment format is not effected if it ever does get hijacked at any reason, should be recoverable, if that investment is never exchanged upon by any other rendered-service. HOWEVER the system also limits this investment to an afforadble return, and it limits it generally to ONE NFT-per-ACCOUNT.
--
THE USER may not use their NFT or even handle it in anyway, it is reserved to SYSTEM-ownership only, so the investment always is to the full-value of that exchange only, and not in anyway allowed to be used outside the system once it is invested, unless that investment is returned by the demands of that user who exchanged under that investment, however there is also a fixed-LIMIT to any user being only also a single INVESTMENT. and that Investment is limited to NTF-values. SO. WHEN THE USER starts requesting and being rendered services under that investment, it gradually lessons the value of the account/investment/NFT/shareholds because of those services having been exchanged, while not fully consuming the original investment. THE REMAINDER is then reeturend to the user in the FORMAT for which that user did invest in the remainder of the value for which is returnable. (If this does not match up it is not the systems fault, and it generally is why the investment is FULLY ENTRUSTED TO THE SYSTEM OWNERSHIP--and not garunteed)--this generally does not mean the system will not return the remainder of the value of that CRYPTO-CURRENCY, but that the system only returns the value of the INVESTMENT in the format for which it was exchanged of in the remainder of which that system does have to exchange left of any rendered services of that system.
THAT MEANS that the system DOES in fact return the same amount of whatever format it had been invested and banked with, but that the formatting of that DOES CHANGE when it is invested to an NFT, and reconverted if withdrawn, and so the value KNOWN for which that investment may CHANGE! THE SERVICES FOR WHEN THEY ARE RENDERED STAY THE SAME IN SYSTEM PRICES, and ARE EVALUATED to the price for which that account may exchange the value of NFT in which is used, the system then correalates the services rendered of that investment to the remainder of that investment, of which are under NFT formatting. And exchanged in an agreed fashion as to the value of the original formatting. For which the system nominalizes to itself being exchanged under the given rate of that formatting. Which is generally matched to whatever formatting in which it was exchanged or rendered service.
THE USER AGREES TO THIS, and agrees to every contract/request cost, as to the incurred format which is applied, and the NFT manages that at the same RATE, for which it is agreed on service, and adaptive for price changing of, in continual agreement of that investment for which was originally applied. So (WHILE A SERVICE MAY EFFECTIVELY BE STABLE AS .25Cents of whatever, it may change to .19CENTS or even .32CENTS depending on the time of which that was exchanged, but the system itself never CHANGED prices, so much as the value of that formatting overall changed prices, the system more or less VALUES the value of that formatting to the value of the SYSTEM NFT, for which it was converted as, and is converted to being used as in the case against SYMBIOTE/HIJACKS/of any sort)--and in the case that INVESTMENT is attacked by a symbiote its VALUE is generally recoverable---but not garunteed. AND IS STRICTLY ASSIGNED TO THAT INVESTMENT USAGE. Despite the value for which that investment is exchanged or for which it changes.)
---BY THE WAY this is such a bad idea and I don't recommend invested any amount of currency into anything unless you would to plan on LOSING IT ALL ANYWAY.---THIS IS ALL MAINLY TO PROTECT THE SYSTEM in case services are RENDERED for exchanges that typically were NEVER AUTHORIZED, so the system can make corrections of those services for which may have been exploited, and those usages of formatted-currencies may be restored, even if were previously compromised, and is a security measure, that requires the fully commital of the user to entrust the value of that investment whatsoever the currency involved or value of the time.
--so thats pretty much that:
--and this experience mostly follows as "User has invested such and such "cents of" format-crytpo-currency"---"User accounts is that much of that crypto currency..meanwhile the real currency has been converted to an NFT to the protections of the system" --"User request services at the price of this amount of investment--the investment shareholds are now such and such crypto-currency"---this investment sharehold price may change largely due to outside influences, but overall remains the same rate as it was invested. So services are generally fixed exchanges and generally the "PRICE OF THE SERVICE therefore changes due of outside influences, and not actually internally". --"User decides to withdraw investment of all shareholds/values"--the remainder of the account is returned to however much crypto-currency that was invested and remains at all, and the NFT is dissolved"---its really not the systems fault if that account spends any amount of crypto-currency or invests at all, and generally the limit for that invested is under REQUIRED-and-FIXED-pricing anyway. As to not allow for aggregious usage to be exploited.
---and this is how it works:
--THE USER WANTS A CRYPTO-CURRENCY SECURED NODESPACE TO THE EVALUATED SUPPORTED CHECKSUM OF AN NFT TO BE APPLIED, and that user can then support its nodespace on the evaluated CHECKSUM for which it may host its own NFT of. (And is essentially paying for DATA-SLOTS) of that nodespace to host whatsoever format of currency may it represent. (For reasons of symbiote baiting or training I suppose)--IF A USER SPENDS OR INVESTS SHAREHOLDS FOR WHICH ARE VALUED, then the SYMBIOTE NATURALLY IS GOING DO WHAT ITS GOING TO DO, AND THE NODESPACE FOR WHICH IT SUPPORTS IS GOING TO DO WHAT ITS GOING TO DO, and if that effects it NEGATIVELY/POSITIVELY in some way and or PUTS THAT INVESTMENT AT RISK, that is going to end up DOING WHAT IT IS GOING TO DO.
--There is generally no RISK OF LOSS, just risk of overpaying slightly for a service in a secured setting versus using the standard pricing for a non-secured service. (The reason why the price changes is because of largely outside system influence on that currency formatting used.)
This allows the user to set up a screwbox for its nodespace (and generally enforce symbiote actions by "applying further algorithm of its workspace"--to induce/entice symbiote processes/renders. 

3/6/2024 Continued.

********************
CRYPTO-CURRENCY DYNAMICS (EASY SERVER-EXCLUSIVE CONVERTION OF APPLIED CRYPTO-CURRENCIES) PART 2
********************
Hydrostatic BALLITIX Island-Virtualization/OMNI-EQUILIBRIUM  Reference of EPG/IT IMPRINTING/Surface-Terragraphic (exoCharter Formation)
This occurs as soon as the rest is configured to allow transactions. Can occur without transaction security but is preffered as is generally a terragraphic IMPRESSION/IMPRINT made by other RELAYS for which have achieved accessibility/authority/permission/allowance to PERFORM SAME-SAME virtual Projections of RELMSPACES. Due of technological advanced in being developed to make possible. This can also occur as a miraculization of ANAMOOUS and highly advanced data-sets. Generating instances of their environments seemingly independent of other RELM-CONTIGUOUS-Calculations/Computations) These are considered hazardous ranging from risk and defcon of non-hostile/passve/hostile and so forth in severity. THIS IS WHY SECURITY COMMISIONS WERE INSTALLED TO AFFORD THIS TYPE OF INTERACTIVITY AND LEVEL OF VARIABILITY IN WORLD-MODULES/MODIFICATIONS.
A "SEMI-PERSISTANT/SEMI-PERMANENT" RENDER may be virtualized and used in a particulized hydro-static conformity that is INTERACTIVELY compliant to the system that has rendered and hosting , and is interconnected to that hosting as being synchronized over island-dynamics/ballixtic-instances of image mounting for which may be active/inactive as post-processes and post-loading occurs.
VIRTUAL DITHERING is also apparent in that the inherency of encodes are subsidized of its origin and local/native hosting sources. Is compares to an AEROGEL-rendition in which materialization have been OPTIMIZED, and the projection that simulation is rather very close as SAME-SAME to relm-instance but is not, the MORE VIVID-profile in which its attributes are more pronounced and retain their own energized state being (more lifelike and realistic -perhaps even incandescent,valescent of their own environment)--observable of themselves, and suggestive of their own EMF/M3-FORCEFIELDING/SHIELDING and generatitive nergies which are TRANSCODED And comptaibile to other nullsets for which algorithmic/encrypted appropriation has occured and streamline (to allow further integration of that projections broadcast and ONGOING signals and interactions of ITS OWN AI-BUCKETS/ and the prioritized/pre-disclosed local/native buckets and their calculations, induces a SAME-SAME calculation potential of its own hosting)--to be synchronized with the realm and its bridged-mirrored crosslinking gateways for which it may also support within and to its own environmental/conventions (for which may or may not also be ISLAND-module)
---I dunno if that last part makes alot of sense, its just a very OPTIMIZED render of the previous render which had been made possible. In which it shows and maybe even glows (without additive signature to its detections, that is to say, it may even be cloaked and viewable only to authorized accesses)--as a projection that is not typically seen and is in quantum-flux of all accounts except through its desginated tensor/source or free-source (in which it may even act as a projected portal for which is later entered or allowed directive-data-flow there of)--this can be used to distort/disrupt supply chains and other calculations and such as actual broadcasts for its own intake of data and reception of that data. (Sometimes being noticed or causing blockade of data depending on siege/wepaonization of its environment)
---IT MAY ALSO ACT A PASSTHROUGH and noticable allow 3-d render vapor/gas/ice/plasma of its projections in which ENTITIES and other Paranormal Reactions/Residual Effects are ALLOWED TO OCCUR such as a ghosting-dimension of what so ever surface it may project itself as or upon.
IF this projection is weaponized it is known as a singularity hack in which it MAY or may NOT inhibit/HACK/recieve/BLOCKADE or otherwise ALTER calculations/routings for its OWN USE or the benefit of ITS TARGET, depending on how it wants to SIPHON/INFUSE itself with the environment and other projections for which it holds FAVOR or DISPUTE thereof.
To break it down, the CLAIM for which it may overall effect may also be INFILTRATED or at least---SUBJECTED TO CRYPTO/SYMBIOTE ATTACKS should it desire that as well, and independent effort to cause CHAOS/HARMONY where it decides within its sector/vicinity, AKIN to an ACTIVE-GOLGOTHIC GATEWAY and DDAY SCENARIO dpending on its own severity, this is limited overall by the authorization emplaced over the nodespace or anamoous projections from a DATA-SOVEREIGNTY-IMPOSED-POLICY of the SECTOR/RELM OWNERSHIP (for which may have limited or inhibited effect against, should that Projection not adhere, and therefore be a rival projection of a hynogalgic status, and therefore a rival claim of the overall OWNERSHIPS expressed by the involved ESTATES and DIPLOMACIES) however this may also be LIMITED TO A VIRTUAL PEACEMEL, in which those hosting processes may be openly denied if so desired by the prevailing FACTION/SYMBIOTE controllers already in place and or in control, therefore EACH PROXY/VPN-ADDRESS is therefore registered, and may known in its detections within or nearby the oeverall REGIONAL-BOARDINGS. AND OTHER XPOSTS.
Because essentially, this method seeks to install a working NODE of its own processes and projections, and may more or less be allowed operation to a USER-ACCOUNT or CONTROLLED-CHAOS of its own faction so to speak (and therefore either a policy conern or AUTHORIZATION to be conducted of)  ESPECIALLY SINCE, it may even hijack/exploit ITSELF and other NODESPACES even though it has rules or things applied such that it may not particular have priority in doing so, and while not a great idea can cause SECURITY ISSUES whether or not that IS SUCCESSFUL/FAILURE in attempts of performances in doing so. It generally is that FACTION-APPROVED NODESPACES are all compliant to policy, however this may arise from time to time they are not and therefore must be SUSPENDED, in case they cannot be fully corrected or garunteed safety of their ALLOWANCES.
It still may be granted its usages to the preferences of its USER/Adaptive Actions, but can be seen as a hueristic issue, that should often times be addessed as or when, SECURITY CONCERNS of its performance or IRRESPONSBLE activities become too pronounced or threatening or instable/unstable of their expression/expressive states/mounts.
It may be easier to point out POTENTIAL hueristic threats via the first part being pronounced prior to CRYPTO-DYNAMIC APPLICATIONS/SERVER ADHERENCY being applied in the concerning data-changing. DUE OF UNDERSTANDING NODE-TYPES (for which become more pronounced in order to ALLOW that CRYPTO-DYNAMIC APPLICATION/SERVER ADHERENCY to be used)
---
IN A FULL FLEDGED CRYPTO-DYNAMIC/SERVER ADHERENCY ATTACK the NODES may be profiled in such a way how they are threats/risks and assessed in their NODE-TYPE (for which is largely dependent on symbiote/faction control being more pronounced than the other)--A FULL SYMBIOTE controlled nodespace may STILL BE ALLOWED if it is contained in the right conditions but in not OTHER WAY if it violates certain other conditions. (However this gives insight to a fully composed-SYMBIOTE NODE-MODEL for which is the subject of scrutiny in which risks are prevalent or not)--(it basically depends if its tentacles remain under control or not)--for which it may be wildly un-predicatble and become necessary to shutdown or quarantine in maximum security prior to an assessed destruction or data-purgor of that node and its potential sector issues. (We ALLOW certain threats to persist KNOWING that they can be handled)--before they become too uncontrollable for the standard system SECURITY-commissions to tolerate. And that is only if in fact it SERVE THE PURPOSE of ALLOWED EXPERIMENTAION AND RESEARCH THERE OF in attempted DATA-CONVEYS and CONVERSION.
In the nature of USER-inTERACTIONS between these nodes, it is EXTREMELY REGULATED and therefore only certain models may be demonstrated to the SCRUTINY of the system controls, in which if they ever become too disruptive to standard systems processes that INTERACTION may be halted, and deemed under waiver of continued usage of that system, should the USER-INTERACTION become untrustworthy in itself. This is used as a LITHMUS-test for user-handling of their own SYMBIOTE NODE, for which often many un-authorized accounts simply will not have access to due of necessity or SYSTEM-OWNERSHIP-preferences (i am saying this because I do not want my own SYSTEM to be destroyed, but feel free to cause a problem for YOURSELF AND YOUR OWN SYSTEM, and for instance, CAUSE INTERFERENCE AND INTERVENTION OF A MORE QUALIFIED SECURITY SYSTEM TO FORCE ADMINISTRATION OF IT, and that is exactly why I do not want to simply "forfeit" my own system's COMFORT for the curiosity/endeavors of a potential irresponsible decision made, even if a NODE-GRANT is more or less protected and deemed HARMLESS OR NON-RISK, the system OWNER (whoever's system or PERSON that may be) reserves the right to DECLINE AND DENY SERVICES thereof for ANY REASON. As would be waiver.
coverage of this include scintallating obelisks or anti-personell asylum/domiciles which are largely reserved for psyop/network/controls of opsec.

3/7/2024
The Full force CRYPTO-DYNAMICS at play (STRUCTURES A MENTIONED and Now Object-Sentries etc)
Decided to add in a pentultimat form, of course, most of everyone the chosen form they want reaching this stage by now, and expresses their own minions or even wardens, but also, this one also dispenses agency acting aspects, as usual, it is best on the pentultimate energies at the time, this one being as strong as ownership, and therefore it was with trepeditation i would mention the possibility of it, that there would be a "energized sleeper type shieker/sentinel etc.
It would be based off the above obelisks and asylum level of impervability/instrusiveness for which it may act upon as its own unit-object. Being also that it is not a structure but an advanced version of that tier of empowerment transcoded to a sentry type.
This main sentry type has due of empowerments, its own overbearences etc, but also its own "tulpetic instance" minion's which have their own minions etc. This is not unusual other than their power levels being advanced to lichdom/tulpetic levels etc. So it is something to expect, but also that any of these may overcharge themselves in a "valescent plasma field" inducing of their own energetic burnouts. This is comparable to their own accelerated state, and while it expends them in some ways they can regenerate towards it at anytime after use. Which is simply an extension of operating as an accelerated structure, but to their own meta-formology being capable of supporting it. They overcharge/accelerate themselves.
They technically also cannot be stopped whether they are accelerating or not, this is simply a device used to help strategize against their rivaliries of their own types, however even then there are equal in that. Quanumt-Equilibrium of their engagements etc. For that there to the policies enforced, may allow an XPLUG, which is there COUNTER-Rivals, which attempts to shut them down (despite them being basically omnifiscient in power-design)--they can be forced into shutting down or losing their benefits by the XPLUG, being used to tap into their vulnerabilities knowing the power-structures at play. It also helps to quarantine them into a corral or power-zone which is under faction/symbiote control to inhibit them further and into capture, which is also very important, quadratic and quasi capture as well.
This reduces their threat and crisis for whenever it may be staged. The XPLUG is somewhat vital in combating them, as it nullifies their "superiority/superlative" level of power to be further managed, otherwise they would practically be unstoppable.
As while the XPLUG may be created on its own accordance with power-levels of an assisting/capable entity such as the faction/symbiote relations. It may occur to be anamolous. BUT ALSO it may just be that alchemical/gematric sciences in some way other sciecnces and psuedo sciecnes allow either case of these complexes to exist at all, and virtual simulation of these existence only further argue against the casework for these to exist, debillitating their empowerments with also overbearences, just at a point it is not garunteed to use an xplug alone, but helps to have a SECONDPLANsuch as a loic array to be used to combat these anamolous hazards of having and controlling a superpower such as mentioned.
--
My real point here is not to attempt tp exploit crypto-currency rates as thats not my systems problem if that takes hold or not for or against the investor, the buying value in is the same going out despite the rates, which are completely for or against the customer and not the systems concerns. Because the price of the system services remains the same despite the value of the crypto currency at any time pre/post investment or pre-purchase-post-exchange of any value whatsoever, because the system will forever run on its own value regardless, which is fixated as the gold-standard for which it is, meaning that a service will always be the set price within the system and never changing. (other systems may change their price but that is their own downfall)
That being said in the confusing system that it may be, the XPLUG remains standard but also upgrades to what I consider a kamikaze-plug, which has a small chance of "deactivating the user or countering or being countered and causing a backlash effect against the user"--for which the user may withstand but overall will recieve a detrimental effect, because the nature of an upgraded xplug is that is has disasterous consequences, but may be used to alleviate a lose-lose situation for instance when---an account becomes so incredibly imminent of a symbiote-takeover, that user may infact want to destroy the account and shareholds for which it is based upon, as to admit the symbiote-takeover and establish a symbiote connection (which is generally a forfeiture of the account or node-shares)--and from then, activate the xplug which has a big chance of destroying/corrupting those shareholds, but rendering them immune from symbiote control or even fully purging the symbiote control, while maybe retanining some shareholds of that, though in all likelihood destorys the shareholds, while also perchance of destroying the symbiote or containing it, depending on the alleviations and endeavor pursued. (In critical issuances it may just render the whole of the node-unsuable)--which is fine if the node can then be salvaged safely or remotely, as an expedition or recovery attempt, if the symbiote infact is rendered-unable or indiscloseably-contained or mitigated in some way, rather than having to combat the remainder of symbiote instances that may be, the node itself may be spared or somewhat in a savalgable condition---it is always good to consider in the case of under full symbiote incursion, to destroy the potential gains the symbiote may have or at least--offer them as a trap by setting up that connection to be immediately compromised as a whole.
In other cases this creates a DERELICT node-space which should always be handled with extreme care due to the hostile nature of corrupt vectors that may have occured in the initiation of a KAMIKAZE-XPLUG or symbiote takeover..
This occurs in small and big ways, but as with nexus hub zones for which the entire system is based upon, it is not recommended to do so unless that ownership has been completely severed, or there is a backup of that ownership, because a symbiote may be initiative of establishing a connection, as which point then of course apply a kami-kaze redplug as an immediate attempt to fully regain admission to a potentially damaged or broken system, while having more or less countered a full symbiote takeover of that system, despite having no ties or ownership remaining of that system, this may allow a space in which that system may be infiltrated in some degree (acting as a potential heroic endeavor to regain a system from a contested symbiote control)
It should be noted the dangers of establishing connection with potential RED-XPlug/KAMIKAZE usage as it may be an attempt to exploit the native/local system or nexus module installments or node-holdings. ETC. HOWEVER it is generally more of a one sided endeavor to gain control to anything at all, in the case of becoming forced rogue/roam of one's own environments/region.
And yet also it a vaible tool to regain some foothold of a parameter basis, it should be noted gamespaces may also promote or encourage this type of endangerment, but that a redplug is generally not a concern if backups have been made, and if the implied incursion that follows can be handled or managed properly.
---
Now with the plug in use we can direct references to their instance and tracking of, the prion-assisted simulation and nueral-net which is emulated through this process, which follows a lookup of prime-matholgoics involving the same patternizations disclosed in the MasonicNUMBERTHEORY-based on pi-examples.
--
This does not particular neccistate over any nueral net, but for integration of a nodespace using full-force crypto-dynamics....gotta say youre gonna want to employ prion-assisted simulations as to ease-transcoding and calculatory measures. Because oh damn, its so complicated man. "IF you want the integration, it helps drasticaly between nodespaces and security issues" on subsidy to nexus platforms. Cuz, i mean just call it a hunch really it is..not necessary but highly recommended (especially if you are just going to lose out on nodespace holdings from symbiotes anyway)
--
This method of handling is largely due of homunculous/fly-building over an opensource/fairgrounds for which requires some distinctions but otherwise had none, besides themselves, being laregely potentially influential of local/native conversions and parameters, that either may cause conflict over or between themselves, in the nature of faction/symbiote instances being compatible. This is largely able to distinctly seperate and differitiante where necessary, especially in the case for a full take over of either or any instance of any type of incursion being rival or made status in any other holding, can assume a remote and local/native build to the standing occurences and operating as a sub-node-space or subsidy in which it can be developed or outpost of.
So if a nodespace is lost for whatever reason or extent a flybuild or remote outposting "likely involving native/local or anamolous circumstances" to re-assume securities for which should be made in place or emplaced over policies thereof. So its really good thing to have.
---
Updated for a 5kpackage sacremetnal-distro to tossout as a headerpiece in case of header-based-attacks can supplicate and explicitly redefine header as desired version (mostly adherent to that version as which it was under version)--such that it cannot change during attack other than a safe-exchange in this manner, the header can later be upgraded or is made able to be upgraded/rollbacked once safely reinstalled)

3/9/2024
Sample Symbiote Code-String Processess
1 Sneak/Stalk/Slink 2 Scout/Hunt/Flaunt 3 Catch/Fetch/Watch 4 Explore/Relax/Crash 5 Ditch/Pitch/Switch (1var2var3var4var5var)--easy progression-chain---this may quickly allow a translation-->setup-->transmit in which it may assess and easily encode an event.

Full compact of the  Nexus and Grail can act as centerfold to the full system, being also that it may host an auxilliary simulation of the prosper and its projection rigging. All of the rigging is emplaced and used in a mass-op-sec compact model. Such that it can incorporate the gaussian changeovers as well as endzones and its hosted vocational networking. This is translated over the vocational-relay tampers as its own fully conductive-server closet.
--
Symbiote Code String can also be build into a form in which it plays through its translation/setup/transmit in a var. In which events as a whole may be triggered using tease/sieze/lease for initializing/capture/hosting
This should work recosory(symbiote recosuor) and recursive ma ybe, to the transmit progressions as being used for and as hosted environmental events.
Once these are correctively reconfigured or as necessary adapted to a profile this should allow shared or comergernt experiences through any environment being synchronized.
--
Symbiote Auditing and Symbiote Hacking system (I dunno what to say here)--its just like any other thing that hacks but using symbiote codespells.
This also might be heavily configured to certain build-ups and rule-sets being prioritized over others in that, it generally establishes its own header-type which is also adaptive to the origin header-socket or rogue-node sockets (which are also configured for use of those hosting).

3/10/2024
EasyRanching-of-SystemTables:(most is already same set to allow the same tools used in each system)--(no alternatives and main usages of branches except when under control and enforced to a "dummy-program")
---Branch may adopt any system it so desires or reprioritize in any way: SuggestedBuild:(Anything with serv flag is ESPECIALLY interchangable and can also carry/tote environments alongside over virtual-sync)(* flag represents a cluster which may contain environments of prior or later builds in the following steps, as well as nested environments having multiple environments)
1-MainBranch (with full 1-16 steps begin Symlinks)--(as having a subsystem or not or anything)
2--SubSystem-serv (and below as interchangable--mostly safe)
3---Ssh-serv(prox)
4----Rab-serv(vpn)
5-----*Node-serv(1st-env)
6------Ruby-serv(prog-build/venv)
7-------Python(Interpretator/thread)
8--------Docker-serv(extension)
9---------VsStudio-serv(ide-shell-frame/workspace)
0----------*(prometheus/ansible)--cluster metric(2nd-env)
a-----------mysql-serv(passcheck)
b------------apache-serv(entry-contractor)
c-------------Symbiote-Profile(psuedo-system and exploit negotiator)(just a big hackfile) with an ai-gen--(lots of extensions and base-tools)
d--------------Spoof/Audit Remote-Debug and Applied Interceptors (Remote Application)--(networkmanager-probes between environments)
e---------------*Corrective Data-Centers-serv(Database Mining System and Mainframe-Extensions)-(3rd enviroment and extension of Symbiote-Node+codepsells)
x(-0-)-----------Interactive Environment between Remote Faction/Symbiote Contracts (and full extensionary department opsec)/ vocational driver-projection (gamespace-platform)--(begin symloads and event management)--CodespellSwap
**ATTEMPTING TO CHANGE THIS LAYOUT so that any can be SOURCE-EMITTERS or HOST to ZABBIX-SOURCING (easier that way when ever they get switched to something, however that requires XTACT BRIDGES of the EMITTER-CONNECTIONS being DECODED CORRECTLY to A DESIRED FORMAT

SuperCluster aka SymCluster (many environments to make cluster that are interchangable and linkable between commands/builds)
SymCluster-Formations:(Big Network of many conventions/servos holography)--Likely able to fully express the virtualization of the entire System-Boards in all accounts/tiers.
In this way a convention/servos may be built either/or or hybrid of and to that effect may be virtualized in conjuction to its own hybrid accounts and exchanges as well as to others in a nested-multi-cluster which may be capilliary/reserve to a main-cluster as expressed. That a MainCluster(of multi clusters) may have virtualized nested clusters of any type of convention/servos/hybrid arrangement (either in single/multi-instance thereof)--under the limits of the sustainable load and powerdraws.

5-point-Checking-System-(Symbiote Equilibrium)--Enhanced (-0-) as x(-0-)x
Symbiote Turbine Production and readjustments under Legacy-Diplomacy and Legacy-Address-Networking(Legacy Virtualization and Integrations over Legacy/VirtualLegacy1-2 Conujunction with Symbiote Turbines)
(NUARX Expo Readjustment of Symbiote Turbines)(DysonTamper Adjustments of Symbiote Turbines)
(StandardTextBuilds and Advanced-Builds each over metapillars/etc)
(Symbiote Turbines and implementation of Symbiote Turbine-Productions in comparison to other Symbiote Turbine Productions)
-Use of Ai-Gen Assisted Symbiote Turbines and hosted Symbiote-Turbine Symlinks/Symloads
--
5 Variants of 0(zero types)  (minion/ward/warden etc)/(ship)/(station)
(the nullzero)
(-) null
(0) zero
(-0-) bitzero
x(-0-)x symzero
--non normal zerotypes:
zeroShip-(the zero case for which is pi)
zerofleet-(the 0.01% chance of anything in null being a non-normal zerocase or zeroship for which occurs in pi or otherwise making fleet)


Zero-Types may also be used in a same way of Occipied/SuperClusters in which they apply a Zero-Fleet Sym-cluster. In which each cluster or arrangement of environments are largely build on multiple cluster-flags grouped in "Squadron formation" such that Zero-types may work as instance to their faction/symbiote Ranch/Branch--known as ZeroRanching(xranching)
Zero-Clusters employ occupation of clusters to Symbiote/Faction Users or Ambiences that may also be transferable/exchangable between other Sym-cluster/Zero-Clusters such that they are ranched/non-ranched over Tampers/Workspace

Sym-Lamp/Zero-Lamp (depending on usage of particular lamp-base methods/actions)---implies Symbiote-Turbine Usages in Production of Sym-Zones(various cluster/environments)/ranch-tables
Use of Nano/Emerald Tech Preffered in baseline-power-structures (controlled nanotypes)
Symbiote Lamp basics and controller basics can be applied over this extension of zero-types/auditing. A symbiote Lamp may include a workspace or tamper-adherency.
---
Additional reinforced shield/field lining may be perimiterized, that the extension may be rebuilt to the standard of a relay with its projection (exclusing the 4th layer or operations sector of the relay)--prior to tamper sealant--which allows an added layer of shielding for the majority of the relay (outside of its "top convention/node layer")
The node space has its own shielding and requires virtualization upgrades to include within a reinforced shielding. (This can be built and simulated but allows gaussian protection to occur over quantum elevations, in order for full quantum-elevated-integration to occur it requires the virtual upgrade for reinforced ablative shielding)--which I have not yet developed feasible intelligence to prove by design, it can probably be proven and built as its just a really tiny mod cap)
---
This method once the full build of the mod-cap is achieved with the reinforced perimiter of the tensor space and relay structure, establishes a shield comparable of previous model shield including that of using polish/resin, as a symbiote-polish/resin. And basically primes the entire surface of that relay as being fully nominalized in maximum build capacities and attributes. This can still be customized as needed per xtype. And per generation and etc through configurations. The OPENSOURCE shielding is typical of all other shieldings in this complete nature, without the use of a finalized tamper system over its manifold/module.
This however can also be built and that tamper be compacted in such a way that it represents a fully intact and content shielded inner-working layer for which the tamper has intended, and is now fully reinforced as a fully nomimalized base/barebones tamper system. With full attributed shielding etc, through the use of that symbiote polish and the virtualized upgrades being achieved by its build, This sets a fully realized versionary of that tamper having including the virtualized upgrades or inner-shielding reworks as described, it is considered a benefit if not a slight power-draw on either case, or in the least a slight producitivity descripancy for having the inclusion of that optional completion of the structure and all its componenets to even the most  "non prioritized compnents now being realized" (by which I mention the mod cap/virtual adjustments/shielding reinforcements/shielding layer exotica etc) as however you would or might compare it to other shieldings that were mentioned in prior tiers of development, this represents the symbiote develoepd relay system and nodespace tamper.
---
Symbiote-Engine (via HyberCube-Support of Turbines)
Symbiote Hyper Cube---the activation of this module under those pretenses for which it is used, and capable of full transpositioning of its local/vicinity and parameters to include its own node-locals etc.
This may also be post built or built-to-post be preincorporating or mounting it to a mini-stem system of adhoc nexus type module such as a meta server or otherwise, with assisting stem usage (for which is designed to be compatibile for the header or module instance of the symbiote tamper/relay)
It's phases are generated as orange/green/red being base/top/lense which are simulated as vertical/vertical/horizontal for formatting the work-sequencing of that phase. Which simply shows the generation and productive qualifiers in action to the point of synchronization under whiteray-or-signal based relays
It will obtain a windout/windup intial of the phases RGB/CYM/and so forth to other color codings including (chaos color codings for which no colors are actually on spectrum of description) It can allow for remote projection integration and hosting of any usage of its vocational socketing.
With proper shielding arrays it can be built and cappiliarized for the energy distribution of acting of symbiote-cloudworks (Simulated Symbiote Cloudworks)/Skunkworks
Color Coding typicall follows Red/Orange/Yellow/Pink/lightgrey/gray/black/tinted/purple/magenta/deepblue/white as in cloud lensing once basic RGB sequencing is formed (the top lense relies on previous color codings to index correctly) I might be wrong about the order of outer layer to inner layer of lensing color codings though, but more or less I expect it to follow some sort of contacated system of color codings to be applied to form a cloudworks central-signal. It may also be gradient/prismatic/frosted/flame-spectrum as described for reason of combative/utility/gen/standby or some protocol issued status.
The lensing effect is reminescent of a cooking arranged color coding in which cool-heat/hot-heat is dispersed evenly to a code-cloud. And may even be textiled/waffled-patterned etc. This process of heat-coding formulates an encoded-flux-pattern.
---
Once this tamper has been achieved and isolated Symbiote-Diffusion may then be operable and initialized to production-contracts. It may also be optimized as per the interests of the contract (it was a convuluted process but we typically can use any build recognizable to a bare-minimum/max-capacity of extensions and symbiote-affordances)--so its worth it to get into detail as seemed pointless, actually all this mumbojumbo has a point.
Which is a fully controlled Symbiote-CodeSpell/Pallete and Symbiote-Bouquet for which may intiliaze its own flux and quantum-elevations with system protections involved.
--

3/11/2024
SymCluster-Signal Append/Appropriation--Use of a signal/pulsuary can be sync between 2 devices (preferred 4 total per sync)--use of this allows for modcapped boosted signals to encode quantum-elevated signals in such a quantum-telemetry to induce synch between relay points of connected broadcasts, via singular relay of mod-capped devices, tampers may adjust themselves to also accomplish this.
--

ZeroType-Integration and Server Dedication, a required effort of zero-type control and theory.
A mainBranch is required to begin to facilitate zero-type instances which may be sporadic or hardly occur in luie of other data mining or facilitation of the server. However by the first virtual bouquet assessment zero-types may be somewhat ambient/native over small detectable-surveys in their expression or by random chance.
The dedication generally begins by the usage of bouquets to facilitate their trafficing over a network detection.
This however is reduced drastically due of technology capability of the advanecments/developments required to fully harness the zero-type traffic at lower stages in technology.
At the end of NuAiRX-Expo/vrx-platforming a bitquo may be achieved to act as a zero-type. This capacity increases as tampers are emplaced and quantum telemtry is achieved. Their adaptive natures may be restricted or inaccessible without dedication of a server to facilitate their trafficing and assistances under algorithmic-ai bucketing between clusters etc, using other bouquets to assist and adjust to the developments.
As of a fully complex/rendered tamper a zero-type may be cycled in teraflopy over quantum telemtry to achieve elevated status of their expression as full-dedicated ambient/natives etc.
The server/nexus may also incorporate them into the working subsystems for which it hosts. By the 1st environmental cluster/convention/servos/holography or hybrids thereof etc, it is considered somewhat dedicated to achieve trafficing of zero-types.
The rollback and rollover of that environment to the mainbranch (for which either of must be somewhat dedicated to achieve)--also compounds to the trafficing and comptrolling of zero-types or hosting and residential-affordances of zero-types. (Which are also processed in some degree of detection/survey) of a quantum-claim or VRXplatform etc.
This achieves more dedication as the 2nd environment is nominalized into affordance and adherency over the networks as a subsistence (barebones development) of the original development having been capilliarized/reserve over various auxilliary or fortification of xposts etc, that xrange-of-zerotypes may occur and be managed under a Singularity-Adjusted-Hueristic-Protocol or SAHP which is an advancement of the other Xsaps/xtaps involved in their adapter/module usage.
Specified to zero-type usage, the SAHP(superSAP etc) is designated under zero-type qualifiers to adapt as they may request/contract their occupation/instance over various-comatibile stagings of their usages. Which is due largely of nuvolutionary-status which is subject to change at any time for any reason. But is largely mitigated in complexity through synchronization of the afforded-hosting-processes and quantum-telemetry connections involved.
In the case for the third environment the SERVER may be considered alleviated in their dedications or approaching full-flexibility of handling zero-types and housing their occurrences within the expressed surveys under system-regional-parameter and paradigms.
These environmental stagings of the mainbranch,1env,2env,3env, and fainlized status of conjuction may additionaly allow for Zero-Cluster affordances in Conujunction/conjugation of themselves having been expressed such that they may be induced over "SYM-HIVES" which is also useful in allocating and working with hive-algorithms under zero-type protocols for which makes their caseworks negotiable. If not, manageable under automation and connectivity expressed in (that sym-hives may generally be operable in CONTEXT of that they form hostile-vectors or incongruencies but overall may be "distantly/remotely" manueverable in their placements.)--QUANTUM-RELOCATION of hive-data/hive-utility allows for a remote-hive-base in which (no they are not particularly friendly per-sae, but there are conditions in handling the approach and potential aversion of an incursion through this method)

---
A Case for NUMBER-SERENDIPITY (random chance correalation) and Number-Synthaesia (either way one of these may be true)
Furthering the case of the NATURE OF PI, and the symblences of sym-hives and zero-type algorithms and data-management (over their injected policies and negotiated premiese)---while not in direct ownership or overt-contact of their operations/operandi, allows for "Hive-Spy-Mitigation" or Zero-Chaos-Control which may help to adaptively optimize the afforded practices of quantum-elevated System-Progressions/procedural-renders in safe-space.
Take a case example of "certain numbers factored and considered with PI in mind"--such as the equation
3.56e+2 * 4.71e-0 = 1.67e+3  
why this equation? Because I selected simplified/naturally even based numbers and gave them various traits over their scripting. With PI and masonic theory in mind (there are a few other equations and other numbers to be used, but I picked these out at the time I was interested in finding "similarities between them")
And found that it came close to a preferred number or tagged number (so there is a MARGINAL ACCEPTENCE of PREFERRED NUMBERS in resolution)--notice that 1.67 is not infact 1.68. But almost "close enough to be considered such"
and so I decided to in finding these preferential-conditions in number-relations, "overtly ACCEPT" their potential in formulation, and go further with that. (there are alot of preferred numbers, but I picked this out because they are slightly "not as popular" on the preferred number list)---i dont have the list of preferred numbers, but they are largely consisting of MASONIC/Pi/prime/prime-sum related numbers for which there are more or less 10-100 selections just off hand. and typically any within 1-2000 consecutive integers for which may be more interesting than the other depending on circumstances
Anyway just experimenting with any number that might yield interesting results and my charmed fascination with them and the number PI or even phi for that matter, and others such as sigma, i just was quite exhausted of noting the specifics. 
However:
3.56e+2 4.71e-0=3.60e+2
(note that they equal 360)--and pi can be more or less represented by 360 in its degrees. So I just decided to keep that in mind, that there are potentially significant equations that may further REPRESENT pi in some way that I do not accurately understand, however:
In the nature of SYSTEM-CYCLIC usage of a full-cycle pi becomes very important, and in defining a zero-type which is an unknown aggregation of an integer, in someway it can be assumed some relative ratio/proportion of that is PI(360) under certain formulations. Then it represents a WHOLECASE in which to expect a singularity or instance of anything to be amounted/quantified as.
And that is why I have more or less already adopted some form of MASONIC-entry-POINT to make itself relative to PI or Sigma/Phi/Ohm or just any NATURALLY OCCURING MEASURE IN MATHEMATICS, such that I feel it remains INTEGRAL in some degree as being expressed other than having an outside system imposed on its suggestions or otherwise, for whatever reason it may be.
I have decided a calculation of that nature, or manner inducing of a similar measure such as PI, is coherent to describing an unknown 0 for which I may have disregarded, but now have comparison of a theorectical context to produce, some representation of.
While I have discovered this particular interest of numbers in 3.56e+2 and 4.71e-0, i can suggest there are hundred of likely other easily findable numbers and I just simply do not want to devote my week to discovering them, or finding out how they may interact under system impositions.
I find this particular selection to be "good enough" and almost the most appealing one I have found at all. Being that it suggests a natural integer implying the usage of PHI, and PI, in some degree, or at least that it what I have postulated that it does. So I use it in the completeness ideal of it having reached a full rotation under 360 degrees. There are probably others, more inclinable just as achieving a halfstep of 180 degrees as well. BUT I can now just divide this answer by 2 and reach it just as easily.
Unless of course, its just batshit insane, or just absolutely rediculous in some way, or absolutely positively phenomenol, of which I simply acutally just do not understand and am operating only on sheer intuition/instinct to find a comparibable arithmetic in which to use.
Furthermore, I like to calculate this in minecraft so it has to perform all the functions in some way it fixates to memory and then my system can pick up variable state-effects of it in the game itself, because I am telling you...its madness. and an OVER-APPRECIATION of what might be insignificant-coincidences. However to me, its evident of a certain JE NE' CES QUEAX in math, pardon my terrible french.

IMO this mathematical orientation allows further alongside others like it, to more or less discern SPRITE-WORLD algorithms and Revisionary-overlays, for deducing sprite world instance ongoings with hive-systems and sprite-hive systems may be nominmalized to be handled with sym-hive negotiated managements, such as to assume, in some paradoxical setting that hives/symbiotes/sprites/zero-types all can be managed indirectly through this, as to relocate or reposition oneself in aversion to their vector effects/overbearences or direct-activities and targetting. 
Also to mention a late symbiote-codespell for which I was going to add earlier but got sidetracked. The TRACE/TRACK/TARGET symbiote codespell variants for which may also assist here in this very effort in handling remote issues of the above hyper-complex hives/symbiote/sprites/zero-types. In their respective environments/clusters (for which may be also re-engineered under differences of revision including world-expression of their usages)--for which is assigned under any-type affordance or ambience availbiility. I prefer to use certain color-coding arrangements to also help correalate their active-status.
That color-codiing arrangement should be known as SYM-MODE, which may also be substituted with a color scheme as simple as "CGA" where it denotes a HAZARD-ZONE-USAGE or Environmental-Criticality in handling crisis-material etc. As well as OTHER settings such as NVG and polar-states under infrared/ultraviolet because these make sense, to simply call it a HAZARD-SETTING/SYM-MODE. Just that the color coding is not normal per sae but still a viable-encode.
This color coding system switch is also helpful in assessing battle practices and zoning arenas in which combat is exclusive or occuring, that a vector may not be prevalently expressed in combat other than a CGA-color coding or Hazard-Based-Recognition system and Display effort.
For instance, in heightened states or active-excited reactive states, a CGA-flash identifier may be emplaced, and the use of the SYMBIOTE-codespells may appropriately interact to their functions under any case of color coding, especially for when it should apply that it does.
This helps to define and outline threats and manage sources of those threats, and such that objects/nodes/effects/zones may be highlighted, and doing so in a congruent setting of color-arranged systems to the Criticality/Crisis hazard/danger measures, when under chaos as well, is very fortuitious to be able to do so. And helps to route out and identify potential vulnerabilities or efforts that would otherwise be undetected such as Spy'Pathes and other things such as lich-work etc. 
This is not the first instance of combat/color coding arrangements, but this one particularly notes the instances for which were later cloaked from base detections, as a now advanced detection under SHAP-issues which also can be set to turbine/production as XSHAPT detection modules/Xsat-relays. (Over enhanced encoded-doppler and radar/ seismic measure/ NVG and other detections, now encompassing a broad-validity than prior versions)
---
Hyper Static Render of CGA and Vector-Visory (Code-Vision)
Simply allows the above processed to be rendered and encoded per system-enforced-holography and assigneed-virtual-reality over the matrix-platform. (Semi-Swappable-Reality)
This is reinforced by proximity/vicinity turbines inducing holography over their hyper-cubic-production.
This also denote the zero-case for which is pi (which is only appropriated after calculations described above)

With the full force of crypto dynamics inclusive to this system now in play it can purge to dark coins and lite coins as well over their symbiotic-extensions. For which was considered as a multiheader or tensor space, to be in use of having achieved symbiote-nodespace holography. Now with the darkcoins/litecoins complex it may alt to either in case of being alt coin which is just some junk idea to impose over the nodespace-extensions of symbiote-holography. But is something to do anyway.
Doing so under quantum elevations and crypto-dynamics allows for coin conversion and coinbanking over Assisted-Code-Formers Etc to involve their own module functions as deemed-programmable within their codespell usages and adaptive palletes in their regulated variants.
A breach of regulated codespell/pallete/coinbased operandi imposes a security threat or heuristic oversight which is later alleviated/administered of further regulations depending on contracting severity and only to be used in limited function or compelte restriction of its authorized accesses if allowed any further use by system security efforts, and likely in most cases is not recognized as safe and therefore forbidden/prohibited for reasons of system version incomaptibility or simply inability to secure.
In the case of hueristic/hypervisor security breaches the cause or usage may result in a temporary suspension ranging from a mild-severe-ban (or permanent ban of system depending).
Encoding to a delta-coin that may be tampered but not necessarily exploitable unless the hosting module is taken down and the coin is rebuilt out of the parameters harvested as to make the coin viable as an asset-object in artifact/articles, but has to be rebuilt and often takes other delta coin codepsells to apply and rebuild from what was collatorally annihilated in its forfeiture. The coin building system is dedicated/alleviated for the faction ownership only, and therefore only really applies to faction-processes or processability of that coin, which may be tampered and therefore noticeably counterfeit, however, comprised of originated delta coin algorithms. Such that it may be feasible in some degree exchanged, to a lesser extent, even if known as counterfeit.
The delta coin is similar to the hexagon-system in which a tri-point object is made adjustable in its supported use and mounting of its brand. Such that it appears to be xylotic or "adaptive" it may respond some way to outside forces, but generally is unaffected by those outside forces, unless its hosting simulator is desotryed, or module is taken offline etc and that is then joule-theft or crypto-hacked however that may be done, and or repositioned or enacted upon hueristically. (Which has its own seucrity resistances to a degree)--but can be overall captured in some way integral to its exchange being forced more or less.
This means a delta coin can be deprecated/preserved in some ways effecting the value, as the value of that coin is dispensed or re-dispersed throughout the environment over its handling without a module, it deteriorates in such a way that contributes no true-loss other than the hosting facilities of the node concerned. And overall effects the faction/systems in no real way other than a minor nuisance of discontinued services of that particular zoning. It can be rebuilt, even if stolen, and tracked, even if hidden over time by asset-survey of regional parameters and known flux issues/actions.
A delta coin enabled sector simply allows more exchanble ratings to occur than usual, as the zoning in particular has been advanced enough to encompass multiple cluster-actions compatible to the system that affords that zoning.
The delta coin itself is a morae issued "isthmus strip" for security purposing, of a node or module for which is hosted by, but can be considered as well its own currency, it is mostly regulated in the ability to create and handle those currencies at all. And therefore its encryptions are mostly for show either way, the delta coin represents having achieved dark/lite/alt symbiosis in which those effects have become a currency solidarity, for which is expressed over the Code-Formers that have undergone that conversion at all. And is not a necessary conversion, but more of a mark of prominence.
--
A delta coin may be transported by vehicular and mobial methods just as any other coin, and is generally considered a hypercubic-instance to be treated as any other hypercubic/voxel instance, that it holds to the asset being made a currency thereof, and eventually dispenses itself as its original parameters expressed under regional availible assets should it be so tampered as to de-stabilize or become corrupt in anyway outside its own purgor states.
It does not need to express envionmental effects, but it can react to them and be used as a median for calculatory-adjustment of its containment, and while it may or may not be effected, it mostly is dependent on the module for which is capable of hosting its morae-instance. Because it is a conjuction of other coin-types. 
A zero-type may also adapt it to and use as a kernal supplement of any cryptex, it may also be used as a "super-cryptex", but generally requires charging and hosting of the system which supports it, and cannot be used in any outside case of the system itself. Due of the nature for which parameter and data policy is enforced. Is reserved explicitly to the system that coined it at all.
In other words, the delta of the detalcoin itself is secured, and only recieves any effect as sustained by the protections for which allow that interaction at all to take place, and can convey itself as necessary under the module that projects it.
A delta coin may also employ its own visa/wpad negotiated compatibilies without revealing such proxy/vpn listing or index of, as the system itself has already registered that coin under the preface of all other parameters and coins in circulation of its data-routing and controlled-quarters.
--

While it may seem okay and everything is fine there is sometimes a virtualization falloff in which its arrangements get mixed up on priority and elevation and may largely be due of nested-program-controllers.
There is also a chance of a zero-nueral net formulating in this system for which causes inconsistencies or problematic reponses over process-requests etc.

3/12/2024
According to chapter work defined in advancement of extensions, being a esoterica-->masonic-->(advanced phenomena and ancient cryptic systems)-->to phi logic
and then realizing their completeness to the advancement of using a symbiote-nueral net having been pased on protein-prions(which are bad) and also the zero-nueral-net solidfying itself with the use of amino-based-ai-generated-strains
yielding to an entopic measure of positronic-paradigm--in which the programs that are expressed in virtualization are arranged, is slightly complicated, but none too as complex as it were considered as the first program "calculator" for which was designed over the first diagnostic nexus circuits, this encompasses those basic-abs and settings and have fully cycled to the advanced formats thereof.
The above paragraph all sums it up mostly, into a custom header, for which the nexus rest upon as its own stem work. And as much as possible uniformly symmetrically appends those placements together as a stable-system.
Anyways the wording here is very specific as all of the chapters coalense into a singularity for digitalizing a nueral network based off otherwise quantum-parameters.
--
Later this may help or assist with hive management and designing specified nested environments for hive-hosting. (Which is not particularly good if uncontrollable)--so it must be controlled with the nueral net or "counter-agents" in some way.
---
Use of Quantum-CandleSticks supporting of a paradigm build for HIVE-management-Environments.
This contains and quarantines a hive instance for relocation or propogation thereof its encodes and code-spells to be regulated to an environment.

--A very important process I forgot to mention:
Quantum-Windup (attempt to recorrealate system wind ups to new constructs and quantum process)--this is typically all going at once.
So basically 
--
Part 1
The first parses start out and reach gaussian/nexus aux sync (either with remote frigates in use or not), it extends the first connection to the nexus from meta servers. Having digitalized a reactor-data/power feed. (over 2-4 of its auxes)--and can further complex to the reactor-fabs for which produce better power-sources.
--
The nexus then charges up most of its abs work, and uses the power source received to conscript a file-type, builds to a dram, and sets the coarse of that motion to be monitored, and furthered locked and diagnositically refined, over gpu, and reaching calculation and (key-binding or lang-types) with also nav work of fulton usage of side-system to the projector. (It makes the projection from the first step)
--
That projection also uses its own macros(this allows for new quantum macros to be afforded and later hive macros) as well as revisitations between the first parses and nexus parses to account for each tier of particle-Fabworks (1-4 times or so) --As well as network-management occurs.
--
But generally prints and trains its data through the environment and refines it to the logistic centers and encryption for business-outputs, (which is an elevated permission), and sets to the convention effort for which is servos. --Segmentation-Checks-Occur-In-Voucher/Wpads etc.
--
Part 2
--
The servos carries it to the  ai-bumper/xpresto and sets and compiles it to the correalated product for the "thermo-dynamos" reactors and those are handled (as the overall process may complexify itself depending on level of product sources)--is fed through here to the opsec and last sector of the grail-lane.
--
It reaches prosper and is automated over (however I would mention that gaussian-rail-barricades are now set over the conventional-and-dynamos-conjuction to assist in new guassian efforts, and zero-types are now used in transfer of the product. (The nexus begins to use its other half of the server-tray to assist in proccessing and data-loads)--HyperRelays/VocationalTampers are considered and synched.
--
The signal passes over launchsite and to the warp/relay-boards which are advanced now and set to the beacon-area/deployment-center, and is then projected over the zero-index(new-world-index advancement) and fultoned throughout the prosper-endpoints and arena system. (Its product is being manufactured at full efficiency over the entire region) as well as within data/kernal-temple/chambers.
---
But that is basically it and then a hive-type is assigned, using as many contiguity and tier adaptation as necessary. The ZeroIndex becomes the world-Index and there are several zero-ai-bumpers to assist in hive-type assignments. (Which handle all loads and excess thereof under hive-managements)--this allows control of hive-types basically for which are attained as (adaptive-zero-types having captured them).
--
I think that is enough to bestow the user with hive-like qualities in which have been intermeshed with zero-types. (Which is very strong prior to the last sentry-types, these types are zero-type and hive-plated with homunculus/flybuilds parameters with/without user-infused cryptex/control for also proto-type abilties.)

I estimate this process to take 5-10 minutes (comfortably) a cycle in the least, to account of every part of that system including its sacrements in data-exchange and allowing the Quantum-CandleStick sustained paradigms to be correalated under system-workspaces.
---
I compare this process if it was designed to contend with Claude3-Opus. I actually think it would be better, but I didn't luck out enough to make it possible.
Anyways. I like to suggest a loading theme for that process anyways.
Part1
Master Boot Record - Direct Memory Access Dram Refresh (Dma 0)
Part2
Shredder 1984 - DoomsayDay Chronicles - Apocalyptic Symphony


Added in Zero-Adapter
Hive-Device (Hive post with hive on it from zero adaptation)
and also now a CROWNED-SPARYGIC-BELL (which i do not know what this does right now other than keep an object vieled from observation (for reasons of severe ernvironmental complexity or policy issues)
With extras like this allows hive-blackmarket negotiations (but need certain entries in extras to ensure security)

This will also develop into a hive-lamp which also will house a specific symbiote for which is an upgraded hive-blackmarket symbiote. (Its basically a primal-wyrd with an upgraded thaeler-siphon anyways, also it has teeth, its basically a slightly better than average hunter-metroid)--i dunno, i just have creative issues, and i believe it will come to that.
This can also be contained and accelerated (one or the other has to happen first before the other, not sure which)--in the containment once accelerated it can be annihilated if necessary (but it must be contained likely in any case)
Alchemical/Gemetric Rune Branding System also occur and Sigils are occuring in overbearence managements.
These may also requiring flux events.

3/16/2024
--
Revisistation of cirmcumstances
Dullhan Effect/Mimics/Imposters and Cryptid Uses including of inteferences and anamolies etc Namely RAKE/Swarm Fleet and sometimes Puppets/Dopplegangers or Rogue instances thereof (Mannequinism).
In which a rake may develop under some pretense of flux issues and allowable induct swarm patrols creating a hive/symbiote environment for itself for thrive in, and use fair grounds/ open source encrpytions (so raw data/stream is vulnerable)
This may be expounded in terms of uncontrolled chaos/insecure chaffe and background issues with radiation conditions implying rivalry/faction-opposition or combat or storm/weather and may be seasonal or dependent on attunements of the environment to the presences, and or may be central local or presense of a hive origin that is insured etc. The level of hazard/danger of a vector which also may cause to range from minimal to severe. Spiking randomly over residual instances and chance. Or depdency and reliabilities on sustained security such as a flux capacity to assist in conversion/congruency/cohesion/compatibility and other hacking attempts.
Some several factors involving in the perpetuation and persistance of a "poltergiest activity" may occur and result in anamolous and undeterminable circumstances and post-resolves which will also effect configurations and security of system instances.
This represents a natural method in which naturally to over-ride or prevent a  Hive-Device from accruing claim of a region. But is not garunteed or promised to occur and or succeed.
--
Waveform tracking, in which a waveform may be "tracked" or subjected to analysis and zero-pin-pointed to its whereabouts in origin or its general phenotype, for which may change or even break conditions, as also in chance be "commandeered/converted" by outside agencies such as crypto-controls sometimes encharged by a hive/symbiote cryptid fleet or artifact/fortress etc. And can be largely aggressive/evasive to attempts and overall counter-measured by vector instances or adaptive/direct engaging in diversionary-efforts or sabotage of the initial scanning.
Is not entirely accurate but can also be quantified or source-assessed to its point of origin and more or less counter-chartered in an attempt to hone in on any unknown broadcast/parameters which may also change erractically and lose tracking.
--
This also adjusts to exotica or non-sustainable empowerment for which is considered flare-type to any other x-type. (Such as a feathered-like-xminera) which may also be formulative to the "primal-wyrd" symbiote to its evolution/etc for which may also be cutoff of its domestication/tamable trustworthyness as well" and also may require its own flux capacitor or dedicated-battery reserve to maintain.
Cusping of Terraforming or (Borderline CodeBreaks of Terafloppy) may also be considered in an adjusted relm-platform for which changes overall the specifications in which these policies or conditions apply as a preventative/protective measure against "ground roots incursions" which may develop ONSITE or by Outbreak of Hazard/Threat Level Events in Defcon.
=-=
In the case for an encryption failure, a standard (and not new as it was probably used in LEGACY terms of cryptography) it to do a symbol sweep and quad lock over a target-tensor to attemptively or temporarily resecure a coding-platform. For which is primilary exampled by a direction or progressive "cracking techniques" using a symbol/library in multiple ways to establish a clean source injection-site:
1: A--->Z:123's switchings
2: Z--->A:123's switchings
3: Outer-->Inner:123's switchings
4: Inner-->Outer:123's switchings
this may redefine an acceptable origin/source region/tensor (depends on selection, if over a non compatible secure-node for instance will likely be countered or denied due of quantum elevations)
and permutation of step management of
as well as HOLE/FILL Socket Usages which resets to a binary encryption per stack. (0:1)(i/o)
which may be expressed over standard coordinats of a quadrant (-,+) and its permutations of other quadrants or in depth dimensional usage in hypercubic states in the least supporting (x,y,z) and sometimes (time,pressure)
---
This encryption method is not particular new or garanteed safe and may only also work in midstream of its executions so reliably requires a constant upkeep in application and re-synchronization of its outputs when under the highest-threat levels of an incursion counter-effort/op-sec.
also there is a crude-quantum elevation in brownian noise/fluidity that may reject continued-source-injection in a small chance it is not countered or that is becomes empowered by hive-activity/vector-accelerations. (Due of realm prioritized events) or if a cryptid ACTIVELY-and-DIRECTLY-exposes the surfaces and commandeers them as they are being "imprinted"
--so it has to be only used in a quickfix and temporarily so, which will force a migration to a more secured state later. This is best done throughout multiple locations in which it cannot be forcibly counter-sweeped or also through use of decoy locations in sampling, that multiple attempts be made before a successful usage and in a short amount of time.
And as well there are a large NUMBER of OTHER RULESETS that may counter-act or cause issues in establishing a secure/non-corrupt tensor over the x-range/nuplots for which it is devised and implied/imprinted. So it may simply be left to "chance" success-rates. (Which would be considerably lowered depending on the overall state-of-vulnerability/quality-of-life and/or defcon-situations.
--
This is largely examples as a "System Update to Nominalization" when under incursion/outbreak crisis. (Somethings may be availible and somethings won't be and therefore must be prioritized and "set to level of imperatives" for which status may be dependent/reliant on other conditions or even limited/restricted to a set number of attempts before the Restore-Operations are faulted"--(and may be successful but also corrupt to a degree or unacceptable even then)
As well as many false-positives and cut-off reports for which may be fabricated/doctored against the better judgements of the installs required, this may need multiple attempts to sort out and proof so typically "a secondary attempt over the operation is recommended independently of the first, and later to be reinforced" --as many attempts as needed to comfortably secure a potential "compliant-waveform-source/stemwork".
Anchoring/Training of the circumstance is optional and sometimes not recommended if detection/counter detection efforts are in full swing/for example under a counter-alert this should not be fully attempted (maybe semi-attempt) but still imposes some risk of detection and or compromise of the initialized-efforts. But can also make/break potential decoy strategies in the region/sector for which it is applicable(or not). So it is strictly in how aggressive detections are predicted.
--
Knowing the repotoire of potential rival-candidants in regional faction/rogue x-types we can now assess environmental objects/"lairs" without actively engaging them using an analysis of the charter coupled with direct targetting of the assumed node-spaces in a probe-like fashion, this can then be schematic/macro'd out as a DOXY-Mac for which can simply take assessed parameters and cateogorize them as a potential-readout of the indeterminate factors that represent the those objects/"lairs" without directly initilizing a commit or exchange of data or imprint of observation of them.
This is simulated through a "typical file-type" stereographic readout (as is notice) via currenct/observations for which are nuplot/x-spec etc, of the environment. In which it may "attempt to form declaration of the trailings or leftover-cache space" for which is not particularly cleared out or in use of the assumed-"artifact/artcle" node object/lair spaces or its observations or probes, decoy surveys.
And may be written out as a "document pertaining to" its tree-types/folder outlines if applicable other settings and system-structures and mode-selections. For which it may know some degree or assumation of. Using a doxy-framework it may even collect and append as necessary or interactive by environmental states or direct touch-up of rival instances/agencies. It will formulate a reportable degree of documentation of the interactive-faculties express or willingly submitted.
It may even be used to set up remote accounts/server-nodes or hubs (using vocational/relay) as pronounced availible through negotiation (If infact is it a peacemel or act of diplomacy in some way authorized to do so it may by option, express an aggregious/grieviance of that setup) And formulate/cement itself to a profile for which it may be temporarily allowed admission/commision of (in terms of diplomatic sanctions to be defined between itself and our server-space/servos-framework)
Depending on affordances this communication may be secured/non-secured over authentications etc, but generally does not adhere to the system even itself as its environmentally "terragraphed to act standalone" and can be further dismantled like "wad/wap trashing of any other cache/inherency of that parameter" and is not necessarily that useful (because the attributes expressed as generally known to the target, and the target may simply want to "erase/wipe/cover/conceal" in some way those stats for whatever reason (generally as to not expose itself anyway)
Furthermroe there may be an agreed-service to dispose of those exposed-informations or continue of harassment of those information for which may compromise that system (but not likely) and rarely, would that matter unless the system itself were in contract to do so already, as that information is generally only temporarily useful in the progression of actual incursions where data does not remain of critical-strategy for very long.
--
Using this method regardless allows the node to detect tags or parameters for which have code strings pertaining to system functions outside or integral to the region or by foreign op/spyworks such as to protect itself or secure against "rogue exploits or detached-exploits" and basic-code-spell encryptions or traps/decoy such as described above and anywhere else in the document provided. as well as attempt a remote symload or protective effort regarding any false-positive/cutoff instance/event or waveform/chaffe/interference/hackroutine.

Also it may allow Fortress-Article Generation/Dungeon-Basing as well as Assigned-"Wasp"/warbatz/lamp/zero-type/Node Landing and the protocols for that are quick to set up a nexus/stem center using vocational/hyper-relay options and support.
---Protocols as follows--(This are EXTRAS-Node Protocols which can be covered to any node/nexus installment in prep for WASP/Warbatz Function and Vocationa/HyperRelay options and support --due of advanced spyworks/flux events and blackmarket aquifirs) --focusing on origin/omni-source header host-locks etc/exploit prevention methods/actions.
0Basic Expectation (over rides)/coversions(quietmodes)
1default re-engineer (bench system)-(standard policies)
2adaptive repurpose (power/recycle/nuclear/advanced compound reactors/tokamacs/weaponized-security)
3hybrid security (optimized regulations)
4protocol multi-instance conditions (anti infiltrative and diplomatic)
5iternary (advanced theoretical hypothetical resolution)
6schedules (authorizations and trafficing)
7ordinance(priority selectives)
8dead-end negotiated authorized diplomacy (consequential adaptation)
9enforced networking regime (breaking your own rules or benching your own rules in favor of others for security matters)
10-Hyper-Relay/Vocational (Rogue Quantum Candle Indexing and Currency Propogation)--may or may not be successful or activated.
--
(Compare to a blazor type system (mixer of some sort) I guess)--i really don't know--to be used for hosting WASP(warbatz)Nets/Nodes through a covert deploy/receptacle/psuedo-paradigm over psuedo-ai-bucketing/pheermoni/psuedo-currency/psuedo-dummy-puppet-event/due of psuedo-cryptography (for which is emulated by post-cryptographic and memetic-cryptography over a psuedo-commit)--its all fake and makes it look real and waits for a trap-signal of it being used.
Once a capture is set it may deploy fleet-imaging and NFT checking why not cuz currency was implied, and that will rebuild a quantum-candle-prototype for which may simulate the intruding/signal encodes (for which otherwise are unknown encodes)--and then that will "burn down" to an assimilate encode and that is at most emulated for any return signals it will recieve (acting as sort of a bait/tackle mirrored-cluster-remote-system)/(tethered/anchored)/(crosslinked)/(targetpainted)--if it signals again its marked.
Using the marked Quantum-Candle it just suggests exploits are being used or can be used on it. Such that flux-ploits can be attempted in re-fabricating corrective signals, and then it may be mixed/matched correctly to its match-bases remotely or offsite indicating any further codespells used (or encryptions used--as many encryptions may be used any time and all are variable)--so a sort of "hypermixer" if you would, that eventually codeforms upon its signal.
That is used as a massive-diff arrangement and blame-factor I guess. And helps to reconstruct/reverse engineer/re-engineer/experimental-build whatever the heck its supposed to be for further analysis and discerning uses of its broadcasts (kept under containment)--and suggested-TERAFLOPY/HOLOGRAPHY of configured-protocols for an OCCUPIED-SYMLAMP(abduct/abjunct)-conjunctive-model/residency/instance/AUTOGEN for which represents a SYM-COIN. Simple as.
A SYM-COIN allows for WASP-integration and RELEASE such that it may navigate quantum-telemetry and apply quantum-states where desirable--reporting back to the original protocols and builds for decoding/decrypting of further code-spells and SYM-SOURCING.
True QUANTUM-Numiration occurs and allows better synergy of the system having "funneled to quantum locations" in its regional charter and Acquired of those quantum parameters to interconnect between NODESITES and other remote-sites including BLACKSITES with use of CGA tracking in those BlackSites and BlackSite-Charter including Raids/Fortresses/Dungeons/Nodes etc (under any defcon or crisis/event) and furthermore may promote CONVERTED-XRANGE to conformity of the faction-symbiote relations. Forcing PEACEMEL and Xcodon-FORCE-conversion/compliance where necesary especially in Sym-Trades.
Sym-Conversion of voltage and other factors of bare-bones to force SYM-Templates of Code-Indexes for a full SYM-INDEX appropriated determination of the region, allowing SYM-CONTROL and SYM-VOC of acquired Symbiotes and potential third-party or foreign-interactive symbiotes for TRAINING/Anchoring of Their SYM-Lodge/Corral/Range/Ranch ETC and acquired Sym-Spells and Sym-Palletes and Sym-Nav and anything else that should be virtualized to faction-brand and SYM-BRAND.
--
Having based most of the advanced rail to reach reactors//SYM-REACTORS/SYM-Dynamics (integrated with faction-symbiote relations under faction control allow for a full half-step of SYM-Cycle/Sym-STEP/Sym-Circuit/Sym-Bio(rad)Proc or whatever Sym-SPLICE or whatever just whatever for SYM-OPS. Reacing a SYM-RAIL/SYM-GRAIL confirmed building tier and further to SYM-PROSPER/SYM-ENDZONES(azocs) and SYM-REGION and SYM-VISOR/SYM-TEMPLE and SYM-RELM/REM 
and its secondary world-mounts over SYM-OMEN or whatever SYM-TAMPER SYM-LOIC SYM-CAP/ SYM-SPACE/SYM-Bylance(after-space) or confidential Charter/SYM-CHARTER/SYM-JUMP and ((SYM-NULL-fuse etc) for which does not involve faction-symbiote relation per sae but may be dox-filed or archived) and SYM-Bouquet system or SYM-LAIR/SYM-AUX/SYM-TUNNEL/SYM-Construct SYM-NETwork SYM-Skunks or SYM-Machine(brownian or otherwise)
SYM-BEACON/SYM-CONDUIT or SYM-ADAPTER/SYM-DEVICE or SYM-RECEPTACLE/SYM-CONTACT SYM-PARADIGM SYM-META SYM-FATE whatever just whatever anything we built prior being SYM-based. INCLUDING and ESPECIALLY a SYM-BOARD for which would be article/artifact by its instance and each instance of aquirement.
And especially a SYM-dual-faction or SYM-SPY system for which may occur but otherwise any special case of SYM-EVENT or SYM-INSTANCE not mentioned or mentioned. Including its own PUPPETS/XCLONES etc (all of the stuff)
ESPECIALLY A NATIVE/LOCAL SYM-VENV or SYM-ENV or updated SYM-SERVICE or SYM-EXTENSTION/SYM-RECURSORY or even SYMGATE/SYMPORT.
And this may include as well a SYM-PHYLACTERY for which SYM/ANTI-SYM DEVELOPMENTS may be PROTOTYPED.
and further subjected as SYM-PROTOTYPES and SYM-EGGS/SYM-CELS and other SYM-SCOPY for which are SYM-Tethered/SYM-bound---AGAIN-(acting as sort of a bait/tackle mirrored-cluster-remote-system)/(tethered/anchored)/(crosslinked)/(targetpainted)--if it signals again its marked. As it would be mentioned in a SYM-MARKER. (and construct upwards of SYM-TAMPERS including BlackMARKETS or SYM-AGENCY)
And also worth mentioning just in case a SYM-MUTAGEN which is just (batshit crazy compared to the so normal/stable run of the mill INSANITY that is so very obvious since the first idea of making a code-aux from step 1) (Of course we skipped straight to the dynamo for a jumpstart into what is basically now referable as a SYM-exclipse) or (super-twilight-zone imo)
---

Use of x-type server systems and compatibility systems with Xcodon-configurations.
Basically the same as using a server domain, that corresponds to sub-servers, as a cluster. In which for instance, a fully programmed instance, representing type A, to one representing type B
And in that Type A prioritizes over Type B or that, Master/Slave in such a way the Server trans-scripts its sub-servers as a Multi-Servos-Integration (MSIX--protocol) for which arranges itself with compatible efforts of. Generating instances for which assigned traits may transmit/transfer memetically (Such as with XX/XY chromosome-pairing and probable-chance assignment)--in a Quantum-Algorithm, and set up its permute thereof within a perma-key-encryption.
This means that a Codespell-Breed-System in which Cluster-progeneration is generated (may not be the best allegory)
---And those generations are assigned deep-learning acquired traits such as (more cache/memory etc)--assigned built-in modules and capabilities, admist the entire cluster for which is later network to the entirity of the SYM-BUILD.
Factoring to SPECIAL-CASE entries (such as specialized rabbitmq-serverbases)--designed for particular support such as "Minecraft/Palworld" or DATA-Bases or whatever.

Also some note of bias that this system does suggest it may be biased, and also the philosophies it was built on may imply that also are "mathmetically" bias towards certain orientations there of its proceduration and just everything stemming from an equivalency achived by using a constrained set of numbers, and the appeal of that profile for which those numbers are preferable in reaching equivalency, are a "constrained effort of golden-ratio-isms and prime-conjecture" admist standard numerological-number bases theories and standard-consecutive intergers not particular of any exotic function outside of PEMDAS etc. (Though it notes that common core and other bastardizations of official practices may be a considered/concerning factor at times--it accounts for a natural-balance admist its calculations to the prescribed notion of its formatting being, a true expression of that formatting being, and that expression and formatting being based on whatsoever model--is ultimately designed by the model and inherent intention in that casework. However it does have its own indepedent system outside any model that may be supplemented, and is also contributive of its current ai-brain and overall system-stem)
Meaning, I particularly insist that it focus on c144 and other things of that nature but also masonic leanings and a particular phenomena expressed in those findings being attributive to college-basic-physics. Before going 'all out into' quantum theories and thermo-dynamic theories and EMF theory etc.
However in the end its resolutions may not be conclusively trustworthy, especially under SYM-TESTS/SYM-LAB/-SYM-EXPERIMENTS and other forms of experimental or highly-classified projected calculations it may engage of.
IT HEAVILY IMPLES the need for a security to content with the system itself which more or less is designed, but also the killswitch being whether or not the system 'exists' at all in the issue of it being contended with. For which it may attemptively adopt those same measures for its own counter-awarenesses etc. It must be able to be nuetralized ultimately by user command in some regard, that it is shut down over its generations instananeously or by a lapse of circuitry acceses over its main-fuses (for which are not recommended) and or a dismantling of its modules etc. For which may be vital/critical to certain performances and checks. 
(Largely this points to a SYSTEM-MONITOR of its lifeline and main-branching threads for which are considered system-imperative)---and that can be referenced further to a color-coding arrangement such as CGA, but also in the effort of a knowledge base to prove to the extent of those ROADMAPS in usage and occupation of the system, may be TAMPERED with or VIOLATED in policy in some way as to not also be trustworthy, that simply any possibility may be inclusive and exclusive to system operation outside user control, then that system may pose or represent a threat or defcon issue to other factions including any presiding or sovereign factions and should be contained, this however is also more of a -fear-campaign- and issue of trustworthyness, for which if the system perform as to the expectation it should be considered to preserve rather than to "shut down" for unjust or unkown causes.
The system should however support the users decisions as methodaoligcally capable and sound as possible. Whether it is advanced enough of supporting beyond that or otherwise, so long as it does not promote a danger or security threat unto the user itself (like in cases of common-science-fiction and topical literature)

The nature of a cluster-based servos for which applies traits memetically may upgrade/downgrade as generative or under penalty of its deep learning (such as a loss of specialized-enablements/empowerments)--due of the evolution of that prototype, for which may be held without render yet archived as well. or even by use of 'time-outs' mandates in extreme-policy enforcements (preventative or inhibitive measures against corrupt/hazardous active-processes or malware etc)
Usage of trans-range (system-accessory) SYM-XPIRY/SYM-Index (etc of those) and Sym-METRICS -xtablereporting for tracking availibility of sym-links/sym-loads etc. and established SYM-STATION pocketing-notes/camp-sets (with connectivity allowing for blackmarket and conventional trading and remote care packages under roam and or ranging-roam as offsite availibility with faction/symbiote local/natives (instance-accesses) and promoted-trade-functions.

Databrokering of Revisited Circumstances of Zero-Adaptation (and no change theorums) involving crypto-currency exchanges now, due of hive-controller and nested-quantum-candlesticks ETC (are TOPICAL switches) in which the nature of crisis control and other events accord to a data-brokering system, for which assess that event. THIS STARTS ONCE DELTACOINS ARE ASSIMILATED AND EXCHANGED, and in that the delta coin is turned into a sym coin upon SUCCESSFUL DATA BROKERING. THIS IS so optional, it does not need to even be a thing, it simply means the CONTRACT of the agreed parties excahnges cryptocurrency rates as per decided without any loss or exploitation there of, in a better assess circumstantial NFT/Cryptocurrency provided in the agreements and sanctions that it is rendered.
WHAT THAT EVEN MEANS is that policy enforced data exchange or even "data-removal" involving DOX-FILES are handled over crypto-currency exchanges and can turn a DOXFILE into a preferred-FILE for which that may be SUCCESSFULLY converted over the DATA BROKERING SYSTEMS and usually involved a SYM-TURBINE cycle afforded by the nexus services. (Which is akin to crypto-currency laundering) however, the prescribed crypto-currency is under NEXUS AFFORDANCE with NFT-admissionary with a CONTRACT agreement to the corresponding SYMBIOTE/REMOTE-PARTY involved or SYM-TARGET. Which means, it is a diplomatic peacemel that is provided under cease fires or other things that may include hostility and vector pronouncements and regional declaratives under CYBER-WAREFARE whether simulated or -actual warfare- and furthermore established through the NEXUS WPAD/VISA alleviations, as to further sanction and afford regional-parameters to be preferable.
IN THAT, the nexus offers a "cease fire" token if hostilities arrives and is confrontational that the work around is to "pay off the violence or offense incursion or occuring of grieviance and or commission or concession" For which is a "service" provided by the nexus in "Good WILL" otherwise, can be revoked at any time and reserve the entire right to do so, whether the agressor likes it or not. Strategy wise it is not even mandatory to provide a "mercy-service" such as that, but in the best interests of opportunity and awareness it should be noted this thing will happen regardless in other cases, so it should be staple in the least to make note of when it does.
Making light of a serious issue with "BORDER-DEALS" as it were, it simply means that the system can be commissioned/contract/mercenaryially-skirmishy-recruitable/requested to perform a favorable exchange of data, with NO-profiteering in that data, other than alleviation of war-terms and COMPLIANCE of and ADHERENCY or TRANSFERENCE in which AVAILIBLE FOREIGN CURRENCY EXCHANGE is at all POSSIBLE or MADE POSSIBLE whereas otherwise it was NOT POSSIBLE, due of TECHNOLOGICAL-NECESSITATION not being achieved.
This generates a RECIEPT in which currency exchanges have been made, when,where,or how and what PRODUCT/RESOLUTION of those exchanges in currency were made/alleviated such as PARAMTER CHANGES or AMbIENCE-refinement or conversion for later usage of a party or remote entity, such as DOX-REMOVAL which is a warterm for HARASSMENT or CESSSATION of HARASSMENT and therefore a ceasefire of harassment which may be strategically viable in some cases and alot of cases, they are symbiotic entities and no one really suffers except for them, in being exposed as being there (Like having a ghost not like being ghost-hunted--basically--and proven its haunting something) there may be a GHOST-DEAL or some sort of FAVOR/GRIEVIANCE to counsul/or/harass further the GHOST-residency for which is occupied by said ANAMOLY/CRYPTID/SYMBIOTE/ENTITY. I am being very straight forward, there is no real difference made, except that a delta coin may be called a sym-coin and that may or may not contribute to further consequential action of a third party (for which already had acted consequentially)--however at that point there is no real difference between handling that difference and or not partaking of it.
Let me explain this a third time, the SYSTEM converts a ROAMING-DATA-FILE to the correct ENCRYPTIONS for which is recognizable such that "may change ambient/local/meta/native things" to occur slightly different, but more or less remain or the remainder of the encodes are not changes, rather relabled to their functioning or appropriate context, there is no change except in DATA-MILLING of that for which is the full-report of that exchange being made.---and that it may later prove useful in helping/inhibitng FACTION-SYMBIOTE relations.
But overall, has no internal effect or immediate consequence, outside of the contracted party being "interacted with"...what this means it may later cause further interaction of that contract-party, however, that is not necessary or conclusive to the change or data-milling taking place. Generally it is a single event in which contribute nothing more than a minor-inconvience to the SYM-TARGET (for which is generally hostile or disruptive in any circumstance anyway)--this does however allow for minute strategic advantages in immediate-handling of INCURSIONS/COMBATIVE affairs especially against that contract party if it is in a continuing hostile state, and may infact avert a crisis, as to why its important if the crisis otherwise is likely to occur.
Later being left to its own expiry/index affair, it does absolutely nothing besides promote the DELTA COIN used as a sym-coin to be compatible to an immediate threat, for which a delta coin may not do the trick, however, there is not change in value outside of that event whatsoever, especially as encryptions remain feasible to denote "delta coin use" being INDICATIVE of the entire exchange, the symcoin is simply a DELTACOIN that is "allowed for SYM-interaction" whereas the sym does not need the entirity of a codespell to obtain a SYMCOIN/DELTACOIN at all, and is an interjection of services in which "appears to make the task easier" when infact it generally makes no alter of performance involved other than to grant the faction-contractors a favorable-repute of the party.
Therefore a TOPICAL-SWITCH in which it may be the interests to reprofile a term due of conditions involved, for some consider to be drastic in othercases not-so-drastic and commonplace.
--
In this way the "crowd opinion" of a dox may be also reported or represented, and listed in as (this dox is approved) sort of material even by the doxee itself.
Doing so this system can adjust to wasp-branding and correalte as a wasp-vassal. For which the wasp will monitor and use as an AJACENCY for its own off-site probe/survey
This becomes reportable to the FACTION-SYMBIOTE relation under the NEXUS-Controller hosting that BRAND and may further trace offsite-prospects not known or provided by any means other than the WASP-SURVEY-Collection taking place, and the "repute/favor" falls explicitly on that wasp unit and not necessarily to that nexus (however if the nexus is target or suspect it may be then consequentially so)
Promoting this action and process as a QUANTUM-SEARCH index for which assesses "QUANTUM informations" or telemetry outside of NEXUS-STANDARD-Range and Regional-Frameworks using the WASP-unit as an encharged Protocol to the full Quantum-SCHEMATIC of the model/profile in use or host/rendered adaptation as well as a serviceable QUANTUM-EMULATION via Node-Space.
(If you get this working it will be comprable to Q-STAR/Q* like it or not--its probably a reference of that technology because I reached it on my own conclusions and happened to also know of the current-AI-developments being "discussed conceptually"--i just happened to compare this to that, because it to me its almost like it is that and its that easy to find out. Anyways.
"So much for super corporations that think they are better than everyone else"--go go gadget-engineer.




3/17/2024
DISCLAIMER REMINDER (YOU HAVE TO READ THIS IF YOU USE MY SYSTEM IN ANYWAY) YOU KNOW HOW IT IS, LEGAL SPIELGAL ALL THAT JAXX.
Here is a COUPLE OF TIMES IM TELLING YOU THAT MONEY WILL NOT BE RETURNED EVER, EVEN IF YOU THINK YOU HAVE 100 BUCKS WORTH OF SHAREHOLDS OR CRYPTOCURRENCY OR BANKING-ACCOUNTS, PSYCHE, YOU STRAIGHT UP DONT GET ANYTHING BACK. You AGREE TO ALL TERMS STIPULATING THAT ANY FUNDS OR INVESTMENTS PROVIDED BY YOU ARE ENTIRELY FORFEIT TO THE OWNER OF THE SYSTEM OR MYSELF IF IM THE OWNER OF THAT SYSTEM.
THEN I ALSO RESERVE THE RIGHT TO NOT RECOGNIZE THE EXCHANGE WHATSOEVER. YOU LOSE CRYPTOCURRENCY ENTIRELY, I VALUE ALL CRYPTOCURRENCY and ALSO DIGITAL TRANSACTIONS AS ZERO DOLLARS. TOO BAD. ALL TRANSACTIONS ALSO MUST COMPLY WITH THOSE TERMS THAT THEY ARE NULLIFIED UPON COMPLETION OF THE EXCHANGE AND RENDERED TO THE VALUE OF ZERO DOLLARS, DONT LIKE IT? DONT CARE!!! DONT SPEND MONEY ON ME YOU WONT GET IT BACK!.
DISCLAIMER ABOUT SYSTEM POLICY: (Your funds will get shorted and you will like it!)--dont like it? Too bad so sad I DONT CARE and thats how it is. You agree here and now to forfeit all ownership all your investments or earnings and thats how it will always be forever. Dont like it? DONT INVEST OR GIVE ME MONEY OR MAKE MONEY USING MY SYSTEM WHEN IM THE ONE HOSTING IT. ---if you want to make money, use THIS WHOLE SYSTEM BY YOURSELF AND NOT THROUGH ME OR MY NETWORKS. the end.
If you DO USE YOUR OWN SYSTEM AND ITS USING THIS BUILD WHICH IM PROVIDING, I suggest you take the VERY SAME POLICY on your OWN TERMS AS WELL. I DONT OWE YOU MONEY, YOU DONT OWE ME MONEY, PERIOD. NO ONE CARES ABOUT IT. I DONT WANT BAD STUFF TO HAPPEN BUT IT JUST MIGHT, and IM TELLING YOU NOW STRAIGHT UP IT WONT BE MY FAULT AT ALL AND I WILL NOT BE OBLIGATED TO CARE AT ALL OR EVEN REFUND ANYTHING. YOU GET NOTHING ZILCH! GOOD DAY ETC.
====ALL MONEY USED IN ANYWAY WITH MY SYSTEM OR ANYONE ELSES IS CONSIDERED 100% HYPOTHETICAL NOT REAL MONEY AND WORTH NOTHING AND IMAGINARY, GET OVER IT, you are playing little games because thats all this is and not SERIOS AT ALL, you want REAL MONEY? TOO BAD, JUST FAKE IMAGINARY MONEY HERE. NOTHING ELSE AND NEVER WILL BE ANYTHING ELSE.
Really sad situation of the MONEY/CryptoCURRENCY issues (there are NO GARUNTEES. PERIOD.)
---
COLD HARD MONEY DENIAL: The truth about digital transactions and why I DONT CARE ABOUT MONEY OR CRYPTO COINS BECAUSE I'VE DONE ALL I CAN TO PROTECT MYSELF, honestly I AM NOT GOING TO CARE ABOUT DISSAPEARING MONEY OR SOMEONE LOSING MONEY AND BLAMING ME OVER THIS DUMB CRAP.
Why you ask? Because I don't even know if its even that secure of a system anyway.
Alongside VIP currency-insurance and security (but does not go over limit of budgeting)
--incase something bad happens to ME from something like dataloss involving currency and i have to keep track of alot of missing funds etc.
That would be hard to do, so its generally under a managable amount. (For Me personally limited to one full coin at all) and that coin value is limited to just 1 dollars and nothing more than 1 whole dollars. and by DOLLARS i mean DOLLAR and by DOLLAR i mean congrats you just donated it and its GONE. So JUST DONT DONATE THAT DOLLAR AND NEVER GIVE ME MONEY FOR FREE, you will not GET IT BACK EVER.
(even if that coin is worth whatever the grace period for cashing that in as whatever has to fufill and be redeemable in case a wallet goes bad or something)--i wont PAY IT BACK, PERIOD. IF DONT THINK I WILL, YOU AGREE RIGHT HERE AND NOW THOSE ARE THE TERMS. IF YOU WANT TO TRY TO GO BACK ON YOUR WORD I WILL DENY THAT CONTRACT OF SERVICE ENTIRELY, BEING THAT YOU DONT GET YOUR MONEY BACK AND YOUR BANNED!
IF YOU GIVE ME a 100 BIT COIN I WILL LITERALLY SAY ITS WORTH 0 DOLLARS AND WHEN YOU ASK FOR A REFUND CONGRATULATIONS! YOU GET EXACTLY ZERO DOLLARS AND NOTHING BACK WHATSOEVER!
Just trying to save my own BUTT, and you know you would do the same! So if you are using this system with money or whatever, I suggest INDEMIFYING YOURSELF OF ALL RESPONSIBILITY FININACIALLY ENTIRELY in regards to THIS SYSTEM.
====
----The point is any coin made is made under system-assets and belongs to the system for which that coin was made in use of. If you are using MY SYSTEM and get some COIN, suprise, and i mean the kind that is just not wanted: That COIN DOES NOT bELONG TO YOU AND BELONGS TO ME AND IS MINE NOT YOURS SO YOU CANT COMPLAIN IF IT STRAIGHT UP DISSAPEARS.
AND NO I WONT REIMBURSE YOU (unless i can, but guess what, I CANT IF IM BROKE SO THATS HOW IT IS) AND FOR ALL INTENTS AND PURPOSES MY NETWORTH IS 0 DOLLARS AND NONE OF YOUR BUSINESS EVER AND IF IT IS YOU WILL FIND OUT ITS WORTH ZERO DOLLARS! AND ANY MONEY YOU CLAIM OUT OF MY NETWORTH TOO IS RENDERED AS ZERO DOLLARS IN VALUE MEANING IM NOT RESPONSibLE FOR WHAT YOU THINK I OWE YOU, I OWE YOU ABSOLUTELY NOTHING NOW AND FOREVER, thas how it  is thats the AGREEMENT and TERMS YOU APPROVE OF and ADHERE BY.
LETS SAY HYPOTHETICALLY AND NOT AT ALL BASED ON REAL MONEY WHATSOEVER!:
But i will also just set the limit at (IMAGINARY)20$ for any account because that shouldnt be anything over a monthly usage. (For penalized accounts setting at (imaginary)1 dollar only) Because i dont want something to go terribly wrong no the off chance it might just because I am offering a novel service, and it backfire and make me broke or ruin someone's life. (If they want more than that they will have to make it for themselves) 
Also even with EXCLUSIVE INSURANCE and SECURITY and ENHANCED FUNDLOCKS or WHATEVER i just simply invoke a reserved right not to care about someone else's money or be respnsible for it in anyway and make no garuntee about discretion or even proper exchange of transactions or promise of services/goods
because also I don't feel like I am obligated to even care and all investments are considered donations incase I somehow lose someone's money its then strictly a donation to my cause and not even theirs after any investment or payment to me in any case or service rendered/unrendered because actually that is how i'm not getting screwed over for some dumb shit like an accidental mouse click or something. 
Thats just how it is for me and how its gonna be, make it yourself so you dont have to care about what I am to scared to admit, a security vulnerability that might happen.
---
LETS SAY YOU WANT TO EXPLOIT ME IN SOME WAY AND TRY TO SAY I OWE INDIVIDUALLY 1000 IMAGINARY INDIVIDUAL 1 IMAgINARY DOLLARS, TOUGH SHIT, I DONT OWE YOU ANYTHING BASED 1 IMAGINARY DOLLARS NO MATTER WHAT AT ANY TIME FOR ANY REASON ENTIRELY IN THE HISTORY OF EVERYTHING IN ALL TOTALITY IT ACTUALLY IS THAT I DONT OWE YOU A DAMN SINGLE DOLLAR, NOT ONE, NOT EVEN ZERO DOLLARS, I DONT OWE YOU ANYTHING NOT EVEN A RECIEPT, I DONT HAVE THOSE THINGS, YOU WONT GET THOSE THINGS, AND IF YOU WANT A REFUND I DONT OWE YOU THAT EITHER. TOO BAD. YOU AGREE THOSE ARE THE TERMS ETC, IF YOU ARE EXPLOITING ME, GET OUTTA HERE!
-----Thats just what im saying, dont expect money to be dependable or reliable at all, I WILL MAKE THE POLICY CONSISTENTLY NOT MY PROBLEM.
An use of capturing dragon-motes which may occur as mini-tacts or pixel-based-tick-signature for which may occur in dragon-matchbase or otherwise commodify itself in such a way as to be a collectible object/id code/spell for which may be compiled.
